Delighted so many of you have liked our coverage of the US elections. Thank you! We try our best to ensure elections=CNN/CNN IBN  India at 9: Team Arvind accuses Vadra of corruption. Has Mallya destroyed Kingfisher? Why is Gen Brar angry with govt?  Coming up: #TeachersDay debate. Do the best and brightest now stay away from teaching and why? 
Simple message of US elections for all parties: be more inclusive, it's a better ticket to win.  my father's view: no one hit a cricket ball harder than Clive Lloyd. Not even Richards.  After the break on India at 9 how Coal ministry has sat on de-allocation process. My colleague Meetu Jain's report. 
thank you. If in US your watching CNN IBN, then what more can one ask/say?  Looking forward to Internet governance conference in Delhi at FICCI. Must attend. #iigc2012  Which are the 10 worst cases of misbehavior in parliament/assembly? Watch India at 9. Time to get to the studio 
CNN IBN: Obama will be the president again!!  Justice Katju, our chief guest at #indiapositive awards: 'I now realize that not all media is bad!"  Today's spl report: how the coal ministry sat on the process of de-allotment. A CNN IBN investigation. 
Breaking: Obama set to become the next president, barring any last minute shock.  tks my friend. Guess Melbourne would be a nice place to take off to from daily grind of journalism!  10 pm: Face the Nation; teachers day spl. do the best and brightest stay away from teaching? 
yes, Jonathan is our American Yogendra!! And very, very good!  Maybe, next year, silver jubilee karke, time to retire?! Too much grey hair in 24 x 7 journalism! have a good day!  India at 9: Fisticuffs: New low for parliament? Face off: PMO versus the Post: has govt overreacted? and a unique protest in Khandwa 
very kind. Made my morning.  24 years in journalism this month, must confess the thrill of a byline in a newspaper column still excites.  8 pm: The Last word: is the SC/ST bill desirable and will it meet with legal scrutiny? 
your a star my friend! Absolutely brilliant.  Suprabhat. My column on challenges before Team Kejriwal. feedback welcome.   7.30 pm: on CNN IBN: not to be missed by cricket fans. Legends of Oz: Lillee and Mcgrath on art of fast bowling. 
Early trend; Romney leads in popular votes, Obama in key state of Florida. Time to head to studio! enjoy.  India maybe out of the world T 20, but get the sense that UPA is in 20 20 mood. Gnight.  happy teachers day! Many teachers in life, life itself is the biggest lesson! Have a great day. 
UP fragmented. Andhra and TN tend to give more decisive verdicts hence become critical.  awards will air on weekend of 20th October. More details later.  Suprabhat! Villagers in Khandwa in MP protesting against dam by staying inside rising waters. Invisible India? 
times have changed since 77.  Don't miss the #indiapositive awards when they air. Trust me, they will make you feel better about the idea of India.  Breaking: 2 crore Indians have landed on the moon! They have experienced Mumbai's pot holed roads!! Gnight. 
Loving Wolf Blitzer, sharp as a razor on CNN. Maybe he and I should trade places next time! Enjoy the day.  Just back from the #indiapositive awards. Truly an evening to remember. Great inspiring stories that humble the soul.  Kashmiri Muslims don't get houses in Delhi, north east students are anxious in Bangalore, north Indians targeted in Mumbai. Sad. 
Ohio is India's AP! Win AP win India, win Ohio, win the White House!  thanks. Great to have you as a guest of honor.  The more we hate the 'other', the more we defeat the idea of India. Or is my idea of India anachronistic? 
Electoral maths favours Obama, but elections can often surprise the best of us. Should be a fun morning.  For those who missed the Obama Romney debate, the highlights 10 pm CNN IBN.  Jaya doesn't want Lankans in TN, Raj against Biharis in Mumbai, Kashmiri Pandits homeless, Bodos don't want 'outsiders'. What's going on? 
Suprabhat. Election night in America means a 5 am start for us. Suhasini Haidar already in, will join at 7 am.  India at 9: CNN IBN campaign against #encephalitis. 350 kids dead and counting, who will be held accountable?  Coming up on India at 9: our news maker tonight: #Paralmypics silver medalist Girisha 
Congress dynastic parivar versus BJP divided parivar. Give me Obama vs Romney any day! Gnight.  The Last Word: at 8 pm: genuine reforms or economic desperation?  Will do! just interviewed our #Paralympic silver medalist in London. Should have it for India at 9. 
Early start tomorrow. Tune into CNN IBN for all the US election updates from 4.30 am onwards. Should be quite a day!  yes, it's Rahul Mahajan versus Lalit Modi in India's first prez style debate!!! Enjoy the day!  10 pm: Face the nation: Are minorities second class citizens in Pak? Spl panel of Pakistani MPs join us. 
Saw a couple of channels write Gadkari obit! Moral of the story: BJP's future is decided in Nagpur, not in Delhi folks!  Breaking news: just rang up Rahul and Modi. Both have agreed to debate!  India at 9: Did well connected netas benefit from coal allocations? Will SC/ST quotas in promotions divide India? 
Full marks to our reporter Sumit Pande who tracks the BJP. Insisted since morning Gadkari will get full backing of BJP-RSS.  #indiapositive awards tonight. Looking forward to meeting some truly inspiring Indians.  The Last Word: 8 pm: Is Jayalalithaa setting a bad precedent by making Sinhalese Sri Lankans unwelcome in TN? 
Turnout could be key. Low turnout could just win it for Romney; else Obama squeaks home in swing states.  #indiapositive awards tonight. Looking forward to meeting some truly inspiring Indians.  Our correspondent Manoj broke details of companies to be raided 3 weeks ago. If he had details, then so did promoters? 
10 pm: face the nation: is Gadkari a liability for the BJP?  Multiple debates then: Sibal vs Jaitley; PC vs Yashwant; Gadkari vs Digvijay; Sushma vs Sonia; MMS vs Advani. Should be fun!  Breaking now: Mayawati approaches BJP to allow parliament to function and get SC/ST bill to pass. 
8 pm and India at 9: US election specials. who will win? and who is better for India?  Suprabhat. Can we have a Modi versus Rahul presidential style debate ahead of general elections? Happy to moderate!  First CBI raids politically 'balanced': companies linked to Cong MP, BJP member and a former CM all raided. 
Yes, wonderful to have on the CNN IBN election panel. brings out the first rate Caravan mag.  Not a good night. Haunted by images of dying kids. Still: good night!  How do you try and deflect attention from coal? bring reservation in promotion for SC/STs! the strange world of politics. 
Too old now Shivi. But yes, there is a high in covering a live election that little else on live tv can match.  Cit journalism, India Positive, Zindagi live, Real Heroes: we try and walk the talk, could do much much more.  Suprabhat. Congrats to Hosanagara Nagaraj for winning the first medal for India at the #Paralmypics. Silver in high jump 
Great to have the CNN advantage on election day in the US. sure makes life a little easier!!  Yes, we in the media need to change the public discourse. Less trivia, more substance. Less ratings, more respect.  heavy rains lash Mumbai. Are Biharis getting wet, or only Maharashtrians? Rain gods unite us all! Gnight. 
interestingly, overall percentages in last election for both countries are the same. 57 per cent.  We need to start getting angry for the right reasons. Not manufactured outrage in tv studios and twitter. #encephalitis  Kiran Nagarkar: Maharashtrian culture is in danger from Maharashtrians, not outsiders. 
Girish Karnad to CNN IBN last night: I am a professional secularist!  GOM at centre sanctioned 3,350 cr last year, Akhilesh govt gave 600 cr. Where did the money go? does anyone care? #encephalitis  TISS report 
Maybe, we should outsource our election commission to the Americans? Will ensure they get the count right!  Our correspondent Shreya Dhoundial has been reporting on it for last 2 years. Says nothing has changed. Does anyone care?#encephalitis  Yes, Mumbai is poorly governed. but why find an external scapegoat and demonize a community for the failure? 
Suprabhat. less people (in percentage and absolute terms) vote in America than India. Does that make us a superior democracy?  More than 50000 kids dead in Gorakhpur since 1978. Does anyone care? #encephalitis  Little known fact: migration of Biharis to Mumbai has declined. More migration from other parts of M'tra than from north India 
On now on CNN IBN: Suhasini Haidar bringing all the latest from the race to the White House.  480 kids battling for life in Gorakhpur hospital, 3 to a bed, 10 senior doctors, 7 dead in last 24 hours. Does anyone care? #encephalitis  Watching IBN Lokmat on MNS debate. Reassuring to see even a Marathi channel can challenge Raj's logic. 
Next time someone asks you how high is your IQ, be careful what you say! Nitin Gadkari maybe listening!! Gnight.  before UP elections, every neta from Rahul to Mayawati to Akhilesh raised encephalitis deaths. Election over, death becomes a statistic.  very keen to watch "the newsroom'. will do one day. thanks 
The US seems to do minute by minute polls at the moment. Pretty profitable profession to be in America.  Must watch: Karan Thapar's last word debate on Sonia's foreign visits will repeat at 11.30 pm. Tough qs to both sides.  Aakash Chopra provides excellent technical analysis of why Sachin is getting bowled. Head falling over to offside. Can happen to anyone. 
On now: Girish Karnad on Naipaul on CNN IBN.  Good to know viewers out there would prefer a lead story on public health than Modi vs Sonia. We ie media need to wake up  yes, one should have some understanding of the technique of the sport. Dont need to be a test player for it. 
almost amused by the self-righteous rage on twitter on his 'comeback'! we, the land of virtuous people!  Election 'code of conduct' begins today. which means for 2 and a half months no govt decisions. Need a tighter schedule  form is temporary, class is permanent when it comes to legends. if there are 6 better bats than Sachin in India, drop him 
Abhishek Manu Singhvi back on news tv. on Last word now making his comeback!!  10 pm: Face the Nation: Jaiswal's gaffe: do our politicians suffer from gender bias?  10 pm: Face the Nation: are Bihari migrants soft targets for the likes of Raj Thackeray? 
Misinterpreted would be a better word.  India at 9: Ground report:400 dead in UP of encephalitis. Battle for Gujarat debate. were India simply not good enough at World T 20?  India at 9: should all allotted coal blocks be cancelled? Why are Paralympic athletes second class citizens? 
Gadkari says he has been grossly misquoted. Having heard his statement in full, I tend to agree.  The Last Word at 8 pm: Should UPA provide all details of Sonia's foreign trips and has Modi gone about raising the issue in the right way?  8 pm: The Last Word: has corporate India given up on UPA 2? 
10 pm: face the nation: Karnad vs Naipaul. Two sides of the contentious debate.  Heard: Twitter is a simple medium used by clever people, Facebook is a clever medium used by simple people! Have a good day.  7.30 pm: Aakash Chopra and the sports team look back at the test match (and yes, Sachin's batting too!) 
10.30 pm: Race to White House: Special coverage from across the US  Suprabhat. #indiapositive. The abandoned Srinagar baby with a cleft lip has found a new home! Good news exists!  2 shots in 30 mins docu were used with permission of those working for Pak Hindus. It was a mistake, has been rectified. 
India at 9: 12 years since Irom Sharmila has been on fast. Does anyone outside Manipur care enough?  India is a country of true generosity. We have made our neighbors happy on Gandhi Jayanti!  Tendulkar gets bowled 3 times in a row. and now, we have people whove never held a bat arguing if he should retire!! 
8 pm: The Last Word: was Sunday's rally too late for the Cong to rouse itself?  Now I want West Indies to win the Cup!  Iviewing coal minister Jaiswal shortly. If you have any specific questions, do send. 
Breaking at 6: Perhaps for the first time, major land scam involving the left unveiled in Kolkata. a CNN IBN spl investigation  After all those years Gandhi spent in SA, surely they can do us a favor on Gandhi Jayanti!  happy to speak to Mr Nair and clarify all his doubts. let not just cause of Pak Hindus be caught in malicious campaign 
Tks to many for kind wishes. Time to take a late night flt home and say gnight. Tomorrow is another day. Gnight.  My other newsmaker tonight on India at 9: coal minister Sriprakash Jaiswal, as always in the news for the wrong reasons.  Must watch:  dibakar banerjee's #redtag film for #network18. 
4 awards for ibn network, highest among news channels. Tribute to the entire team  My heart says India. Best to go by heart nowadays!  am a proud Marathi manoos (Goan Maharashtrian to be exact!), without needing Raj T permission to say so! 
Cnn ibn wins best english news channel at indian tv awards. 6th time in 7 years!! Aaj tak wins it in hindi!  My apologies: its 31 runs or 24 balls to spare for India to qualify. Thanks Mohandas Menon.  First they came for the south Indian, then the Muslim, then the North Indian/Bihari. Only the Parsis left! Sad. Gnight. 
Ibn 7 superidols for specially abled wins indian tv academy award for best event  Australia qualifies for semis. India needs to win by 34 runs or in 15 overs now to qualify. Else, Pakistan goes through  Wish Thackerays would visit our IBN Lokmat newsroom. First rate Marathi channel with professionals from every region of India. 
IBN7's Zindagi Live episode on Godhra wins Best Current Affairs Show at Indian TV academy Awards. Well done Team Zindagi Live!  10 pm: Face the nation: Is Gandhi still relevant in our times? 10.30 pm: CJ spl: Gandhigiri in action  Just asking: is Delhi today more 'cosmopolitan" than Mumbai? Maybe because no one 'belongs' to Delhi? 
Shashi Tharoor is on Devils Advocate today. 2 pm and 8.30 pm on CNN IBN.  India at 9: will Kejriwal be a successful politician? Can his party work? Who targeted Gen Brar?  Why can't the Thackerays come up with an agenda for urban renewal in Mumbai? Or is it easier to find an 'enemy' a day? 
ec rules don't allow us to give Himachal post poll results till after the Gujarat polls ie Dec 17th.  6.30 pm on CNNIBN: build up to India's do or die game against SA. Kumble, Aakash and Kartik will take your qs. log onto   Cong patronized Thackerays, BJP allied with them, elite 'feared' them, Maharashtrians saw them as 'protectors'. 
No party has been reelected in Himachal since 1985. Will Dhumal break the jinx? The LPG factor could hold the key.  The Last Word at 8 pm: is Lal Bahadur Shastri India's forgotten PM? Has history been unfair to him?  Mumbai is a 'cosmopolitan' city yet ruled by Thackerays for decades. Someone please explain the paradox? 
Suprabhat. Great to see so many Himachalis out in wintry conditions casting their vote. festival of democracy!  Citizen journalist special on Gandhi Jayanti on CNN IBN: 12.30 and 10.30. What is true meaning of Gandhigiri?  Disgusted with targeting of Biharis by Raj T. There must be zero tolerance of hate speech. lock up those who resort to it. 
Have a working Saturday ahead. Life isn't always what you want it to be. Enjoy the weekend, be good.  Happy birthday Shastriji. Short in height, tall in stature.  8 pm on IBN 7: Zindagi live: Misuse of dowry act, section 498 A. Richa Anirudh and team put out a Satyamev Jayate every week! 
News tv's first serious health show: Living it up looks at adult depression. 12.30 and 6.30. Also,#indiapositive is back at 1.30  Gandhi Jayanti: a ritual. We celebrate the man, dishonor his memory with violence of the mind and body.  CNN IBN primetime:7.30: Brosnan,8pm: Cyrus, 8.30: Devils Advocate. 9.30: PAK Hindus docu 10pm:Southern Stars:Dhanush; 10.30:#Indiapositive 
Sat spls on CNN IBN: southern stars: Mani Ratnam 12 noon and 8 pm. Dimensions with Michael Douglas at 2 and 10 pm.  Suprabhat. Gandhi Jayanti. What can one say but 'Bande mein tha dum!' Happy birthday Bapu!  Thank you Mr Maken. Wish UPA 2 had a few more pro active ministers. #Paralmypics 
Don't miss our Himachal election spl on CNN IBN. Young and Restless in HP. 8.30 pm  Old Marathi saying which my grandpa gave me: kutra bhoonkto raja aikto. Translation: dogs bark, king listens!  #Paralmypics shocker. Will minister Maken act with same alacrity he did during Olympics? Or do specially abled not matter? 
Average age of members of our walking club is 65! I guess we end up talking more, walking less!  Kuch to log kahenge, logon ka kaam hai kehna. Chodo bekar kee baatein. One life to lead. Gnight!  #Paralmypics shocker. Breaking now: CNN IBN learns many athletes not given DA, in some cases escorts/coaches not allowed in village. 
Suprabhat. Saturday club in full form in park. Poetry, song, jokes, and above all, that precious commodity: laughter!!  when it comes to Modi, difficult to get rational responses from all sides. Terribly polarizing debate subject.  Must read: Swaminathan Aiyar in Times of India. Practical advise in a coal debate marred by rhetoric. 
Breaking: CAG pulls up oil ministry for agreeing to Reliance conditions on audit. Oil minister at the time was Jaipal!!  Haryana activist says he has no info on Sonia's health expenses. If any of you have details of the 1880 cr figure, do share.  Friend has just put together a CD of school/college music. Great way to spend a Sunday. Enjoy the day. 
10.30 pm: Now Showing: just how good is the new Bond movie.  10 pm: World Elderly persons day: why are there more cases than ever before of children mistreating their aged parents?  Especially the bit about our netas abusing each other in parliament and then going on dinner 'dates' together. So true. 
yes, Dr Swamy is on the panel  India at 9: Modi targets Sonia, Mamata mimics Manmohan. Personal attacks a part of electoral politics? Save our Sailors: a CNN IBN campaign  10.30 am, 2.30 pm and 8 pm 
10 pm: worldview with Suhasini Haider: has hurricane Sandy given Obama an edge in US electoral race?  8 pm, The Last Word: will street protests reverse reform?  Suprabhat. Must watch: Cyrus Broacha's take on parliament logjam on Week That Wasn't. Could do with more humor in the times we live. 
India at 9: time for Gandhi family to break self imposed silence and take questions?  Would love to see all the negative tweets about team India just 48 hours ago! Such is life. Fickle. Gnight.  Standing joke in North/South block. Throw a stone and fair chance it will hit a Menon, Pillai or a Nair! Gnight. 
The last word at 8 pm: Swamy and Kejriwal: hit and run netas or agents of change?  Just how good is Virat Kohli? Easily the best under 25 batsman in the world. And maybe even more.  Mallu power ensured parliament had a holiday on Onam. Don't think we get one for Gudi Padwa! 
Road accidents killed 17 Indians every hour last year. Stay safe, drive safely. And have a good day. Bye.  If a week is a long time in politics, in T 20 cricket, 48 hours are enough! Well done team India!  The community pride of Delhi's Keralaites matched by few others. They also are a power axis in the capital. 
LPG single factor that could cost Cong Himachal. remember no govt re-elected in HP since 1985.  doordarshan is the 3 rd van burnt.  had a fantastic Onam lunch courtesy a friend and colleague. Kerala food only adds to the attraction of God's own country 
My Hindustan Times column on Gadkari and the BJP crisis. Feedback welcome.   top headline on CNN IBN since 3 pm. Reported without exaggeration.  Sagarika Ghose in Outlook on social media, hate speech and censorship.  
It's never nice to get up early in the morning and hear of death. Sets your whole day back.  As always, a few protestors take law into their own hands. Convert a city into a 'war zone'. Sad.  Sorry, devils advocate with Sibal at 3.30 pm today 
Suprabhat. Yerran Naidu, TDP leader and the face of the party in Delhi, dies in a road accident. RIP.  3 OB Vans burnt in Hyderabad, including Sakshi and Andhra Jyothi. Why shoot the messenger?  Devils advocate with Kapil Sibal repeats on CNN IBN at 4.30 sat, 2 pm and 8.30 sunday 
Etonight is at 11.30 pm tonight on CNN IBN because of the Delhi 84 news docu at 10.30.  Ok folks, game about to begin! Telangana is a top headline, but for next 3 hours, cricket will take over. Bye.  one at a time, there are a zillion stories to be told. 
Suhel Seth questioned my ability to ask 'intelligent' questions on India at 9, I am 'offended' and will sue him! Gnight.  classic rumor mongering; use twitter to spread information, not rumor.  Part 2 of the Vijay Amritraj interview with Pierce Brosnan. Sat 10 pm, sunday 10 am and 7,30 pm 
I agree. My fault  #Telanganamarch marching through Hyderabad will not bring statehood; political compulsions just might.  On Southern Stars on CNN IBN. 8 pm saturday, Sunday 1.30 and 10: the Kolaveri Di man, Dhanush. 
For a politician leading a one man party, Swamy sure keeps himself politically relevant. A political cat with many lives!  Telangana protests peaceful. Not sure why regional channels blacked out. blacking out leads to rumor mongering.  Dont miss on CNN IBN: The plight of the Pakistani Hindu on 30 minutes. Sat 8.30, sunday 12 noon and 9.30 pm 
After Rahul, now Sam Pitroda threatens to take Swamy to court. Just asking: why threaten, why not just do it?!  On now on CNN IBN: LOC. Put your qs to Kumble, Srikkanth, M Karthik and Aakash. Log onto   Suprabhat. Nothing like taking your dog for a walk to clear the mind. highly recommended every morning 
Swamy to CNN IBN: I don't believe in hit and run, or shoot and scoot. Wonder who he is referring to? Any guesses?  he picked the 15 with other selectors. Picking Chawla in xi is the captain/coach call  yup, school, college, building, cricket, club friends and family. Can't beat any of them in my book 
you have to shift to digital in Kolkata. Go get a box!  Srikkanth to CNN IBN: drop Chawla, play Sehwag. Don't drop Yuvraj, he is a match winner.  Friday night. Who should I 'hang out'with? Old school friends coming home for dinner, surely better than netas! Gnight. 
thank you. Frankly, too little of public health issues are debated on prime time tv. Needs to change.  Other big story: Telangana march. First Ganesh visarjan, now Telangana. Feel sorry for cops in Hyderabad!  don't have an answer Anirudh. But yes, being excessively opinionated is a professional weakness! 
Coming up at 10 on face the nation: the dengue epidemic: are we losing the battle? 10.30 pm: remembering 84 genocide.  Krish Srikkanth on CNN IBN at 1 pm. Who will win India Pak game, who should be picked?  is it true that Ajay Devgn also is part owner of a wind power plant in Gujarat? 
takes all types to make the world, good, bad, ugly.  Support online petition #bharatratnaforkurien . Contact or moneylife.in for more  Got to hand it to Modi. Doing what Rahul Gandhi, the 'youth' leader should be doing. 
thank you. Yes, Mr Phoolka is a one man army who is still fighting for justice for victims of 84.  One request: can we ie news channels stop calling the game 'war' or 'Mahasangram'. For me, LOC is love of cricket! Enjoy!  Watching now a classic Devils Advocate. Karan Thapar versus Sibal. Rpt at 11.30. Karan should have been public prosecutor! 
Must watch: IBN 7: 11 pm Zindagi Live on widows of 84. Easily one of the most powerful tv progs I have ever seen  Don't miss #Indiapositive. 12.30 and 5.30 pm. Also, Mamata iview repeats at 11.30 am and 9.30 pm. Southern stars at 1.30 and 10.30  Looking forward to #ModiHangOut. Can anyone ask him questions or is it just the fan club? 
we go with the news of the day. maybe might help to see journalism with less jaudiced eyes.  Living it up: our new health spl: catch it at 9.30 am and 3.30 pm. Feedback welcome.  after the debate on 84 vs 2002 we just had (repeat at 9 pm), feel like starting a film: Rajdeep Sardesai ko gussa kyon aata hai! 
maybe Dr Swamy sees Kejriwal as a threat! Its AK 47 who gets all the plaudits and coverage!  Strange feeling the winner of today's game will feel like they've won the World Cup and forget there is a tournament to be won.  to be called 'illiterate' by Mani Shankar Aiyar is a badge of honour! 
Yes, we are planning a story on how the Goa mining shutdown has affected the state.  If you have questions for our cricket panel, log onto   10 pm: worldview. The view from Teheran, a CNN IBN special. 
Subramanium Swamy is our newsmaker tonight: is he making wild allegations or is there substance in his claims?  Our full team is out: Kumble, Kartik, Aakash, and the returning Krish Srikkanth. Spl coverage IBN 7 and CNN IBN from 6 pm  India at 9: The Naroda Patiya verdict; the Subodh Kant Sahay connection to coal allocations. 
Our spl report tonight: how illegal miners of Orissa have been let off lightly a year after CNN IBN exposed the mining scam in the state.  History says India, chemistry says Pakistan, cricket matches are decided by arithmetic.  The Last Word at 8 pm: Karan Thapar plays Devils Advocate with Kapil Sibal 
10 pm: face the nation: The threat of dengue. are we losing the battle?  Suprabhat! Super Sunday. India versus PAK in the T 20. May the best team win!  Top trend today should be Judge Jyotsna Yagnik. reaffirms faith in rule of law. 
India at 9: Should an 'offensive' tweet on social media lead to an arrest?  My old school friend and the original Raymond man Gautam Singhania is now on twitter.  6 pm and India at 9: on CNN IBN. where did the prosecution succeed in Gujarat 2002 that it failed in 1984? 
8 pm: CNN IBN The Last Word: Will 1984 riots always haunt the Cong? 10.30 pm: the fight for justice for the widows of 84.  The Economist on the state of Indian politics: worth a read.   PM on return from Teheran; No question of resigning, BJP must wait for an election. 
IBN 7's 84 special on widows of 84 is at 3 and 11 pm, CNN IBN at 5.30 and 10.30 pm. Lest we forget.  My Bhutan diary in the latest Outlook. feedback welcome.   Karan Thapar versus Kapil Sibal. watch the Devil take on the advocate on coal at 8 pm tonight on CNN IBN. fireworks promised!! 
8 pm on The Last word: Do the 84 riots still haunt the Congress?  Analysis at a closed door session: BJP needs an Atalji, Cong needs a Rao. Both national parties lacking real leadership.  For your info: it was CNN IBN's Manoj Gupta and Bhupen Chaubey who had first exposed the Subodh Kant coal block connection 
Zindagi live: 84 riots spl on IBN 7 at 3 pm and 11 pm. 30 minutes spl on CNN IBN at 5.30 and 11.30 pm  On now: repeat of the Mamata iview on CNN IBN.  join the ibnlive coal poll.  
Recommend viewing. IBN 7 Zindagi live on widows of 84. One of the most powerful tv programmes ever made.  Must read; Shekhar Gupta on ISRO spy case   I agree. 
Happy bday Karnataka, AP, Kerala, Haryana, Punjab, MP, C'garh: if any state left out, my apologies. We are one India! Have a great day.  Visarjan day. Brings back childhood memories of Chowpatty. Pudchya Varshi Lavkar Ya. Have a safe weekend.  well, ideally blanket ban. But if at all, I agree with you, a minimum 5 year cooling off period. 
my apologies. Happy Haryana day too! Wow! Lots of states born today!  We're starting a new series on health issues every weekend. Believe its a major gap in news programming.  BJP should not have made ex CAG TN Chaturvedi an MP and governor, ditto Cong with Gill or Ranganath Mishra 
And AP and Kerala foundation days too! Wishes to all of you. Southern rising!  World Heart Day: why are 20 to 30 year olds prone to risk? new series of Living it Up begins. 12.30 and 5.30 pm on CNN IBN  No CEC, Supreme court justice, CAG or constitutional functionary should join a political party after retirement. 
Was in college in 84, but reported on two riots extensively. mumbai 92-93, Gujarat 2002. Would never want to see a repeat.  CNN IBN Sat spls: 30 minutes: My son is gay (8.30 pm), Hugh Hefner part 2 (10 pm), southern stars Venkatesh 12 noon and 8 pm  Digvijay Singh attacks CAG for 'political ambition'. But should Cong have given a cabinet berth to a former CEC? 
And wish all my Kannadiga friends happy Karnataka Rajyotsava. foundation day!  For those who missed the Mamata iview on CNN IBN, it repeats Saturday 2 pm, Sunday 11.30 am and 9.30 pm.  very good point. The world loves a winner. But, hopefully, they also serve those who stand and wait! 
Cong in 84, Shiv Sena in 92 93, BJP in 2002: all have blood on their hands.  Suprabhat. The last weekend of the north Indian summer. Bring on October!  Suprabhat. Thank god it's Friday! When will we have the concept of a long weekend in India? 
thank you. Very kind. Judge us by our journalism. The motto: fair, balanced, independent. Be it Reliance or Vadra or Gadkari.  Brajesh Mishra: fine mind, first rate diplomat/bureaucrat, ran Vajpayee's PMO like a well oiled machine. RIP  Sachin Tendulkar didn't go to college, but he passed the biggest exam of all: it's called 'life'! Gnight. 
November 1: on this day 28 years ago, 3000 Sikhs were killed. A horrific dark spot. Lest we forget.  Breaking: Brajesh Mishra, former NSA and Vajpayee's principal secy, passes away  good point Vishakh. Yes, rules can be flexible, but they must exist. 
November: strongly recommend an early morning walk if you are in delhi. Smell of winter in the air.  India vs Aus in World Cup, KBC: not sure how many watched India at 9. I know my mum did! Gnight!  My own view? if you don't attend college, you don't get to do exams; if you don't attend parliament, you lose membership. 
Suprabhat. It's November: promises to be a cracker of a month, and not just because of Diwali!  Thank you for strong feedback to our rhino focus, and the Mtra irrigation scam. We will keep tracking these stories.  Just asking: if there is a minimum attendance for sportsmen in colleges, should similar criteria apply to parliament? 
Kejriwal's 'reliance' on media, media's 'reliance' on him. Lot of gas in the air! And more to come. Gnight.  2 more rhinos who were on life support dead in Assam. Thats 6 in 72 hours. #SaveTheRhino  First rate story by my colleague Arijit Sen on child soldiers in Manipur on India at 9. More to tv news than shrill debate. 
If Modi has the right to call someone a 50 crore 'girlfriend', surely the woman has a right to reply?!  Save Rhino campaign our top story at 9 pm. Time to act to save the great Indian rhino  #Indiapositive acid attack victim Sonali Mukherjee goes through reconstructive surgery in hospital. Prayers with her. 
Sonia is an old and valued ex colleague. High regard always  10 pm: worldview with Suhasini Haidar. Fareed Zakaria among others join her on the UN summit.  Coming up at 10: the Unmukt Chand St Stephens controversy, sports minister Ajay Maken, Principal Thampu, Kirti Azad join us 
Coming up on India at 9: rare audio of Sardar Patel.  India at 9: Who will save the Indian rhino? Is Ajit Pawar the only big M'tra politician involved in multi-crore irrigation scam?  wake up guys! Bangalore was our top story. 
#Sunanda Pushkar to CNN IBN: I never thought the Gujarat CM would stoop so low. Full interview at 10 pm  The Last Word at 8 pm: Is Gadkari the right man to lead the BJP into the future?  yes, he got into Stephens on sports quota, but univ rules demand 33 per cent attendance. he had less than 10 per cent 
AK Bhattacharya of Biz Standard: its a phuljadi which can help illuminate what is the truth of the KG basin.  Life too short. Live it without rancour or regret. Take joy in simple pleasures. Am I sounding like Sri Sri?! Have a good day!  Shashi Tharoor among others joins Karan on the 8 pm debate on CNN IBN. will raise relevance of NAM 
we have a rare audio of Sardar Patel. will try and play it at the end of India at 9 tonight in memory of a great Indian.  Just heard of a plane crash in Nepal, all 19 on board killed. How quickly 'feel good' can become 'feel bad'.  Big story at 7 pm: 11 people, (incl reportedly a journalist) arrested in Bangalore for allegedly plotting terror attack 
Karan Thapar asks: was Kejriwal's revelation today a bomb, a phataka or just a phuljadi! what do you think?  Chai, biscuits, gupshup. It's the morning feel good factor before the 'news' takes over.  10 pm: Face the Nation: Unmukt Chand not allowed to appear for exams by St Stephens. Do elite colleges discourage sport? 
10 pm: Face the nation: Sunanda Pushkar and the modern Indian woman.  Remarkable the number of senior citizens out in the park before sunrise. Their smiling faces light up the morning.  India at 9: The politics of malnutrition: has Narendra Modi confused lifestyle issues with malnutrition? 
India at 9: Kejriwal versus Reliance: is crony capitalism a stark reality? Latest from TN cyclone.  Suprabhat. Waking up at 6 am with a hint of autumn chill. The joys of life!  The big breaking story tonight: CNN IBN accesses the list of the pvt companies to be named by CBI in coal FIR. 
8 pm: The Last word: Are Kejriwal's allegations against Reliance significant or is he recycling an old story?  No one liners tonight. Just a simple Gnight.  8 pm: The Last Word: Should the PM be at NAM when parliament is facing a political impasse? 
yes, just saw a half page in Hindustan Times. Could do with a real Sardar in today's India, not the fakes.  do feel same reforms 2 years ago would have been seen as a sign of a strong govt. now it's seen as an act of desperation.  7.30 and 11.30 pm: The Master speaks: Tendulkar looks back at 2011-12 and ahead to a new season in a CNN IBN special 
true. Just wish we had a great freedom museum in the country. A way of connecting the past to the present.  it could be picking up a mix of anger and fatigue, and worryingly for the govt, a trust deficit.  Exercise listening to Kishore Kumar on CD with the US open on tv! It's called multi tasking in the mornings! Enjoy the day. 
Today Sardar Patel birthday. Haven't seen a single major ad on the Iron Man. Lots of ads of Indira. Have a good day.  'urban' India isn't just those who live in high rises! Many more live in slums, chawls and 2 room tenements.  Suprabhat. All angst taken out of system; raindrops have cleared the head. Rimjhim gire saawan! 
Just heard the name of the likely 'target' of a Kejri 'bomb' today. Interesting day ahead.  aim is to measure mood in major metros. It's an 'opinion' poll, not an election verdict.  Time to get off twitter. No mood to deal with trolls or bigots tonight. My dog and drink beckons! Gnight. 
For those who missed Gujarat pre poll survey findings, we hope to repeat them at 11.30 am this morning.  will answer your qs on sample size and more doubts. Join me on a webchat at 5 pm tomorrow on   A Kashmiri Pandit who lost family members is no different to a Shakila. All victims of hate, bigotry and violence. 
sir, you have only 3 lifelines, netas, like cats, have 9 lives!  Too many netas (and anchors!) on tv are angry and arrogant at times. Could do with more reason and restraint (all of us!)  If you report Naroda Patiya, you have to 'prove' you reported Godhra to show 'neutrality'. terrible zero sum 'game'. 
Move over Kaun Banega Crorepati! Kaun Banega Corrupt coming on a tv screen near you! Host: not AB but AK! Gnight  Most impressed with Sandeep Dikshit. Comes across on TV as a earnest neta with substance. Rare.  Shakila Bano stitched clothes at weddings in the mohalla. 8 members of family killed by someone whose wedding dress she stitched! 
Tomorrow 4 pm Kejriwal to announce another 'name' in corrupt list!  For more details on poll, methodology and all the talking points, log onto   be it Gujarat, Assam, Delhi, Mumbai , Bhagalpur, and so many others: what makes a neighbor kill a neighbor? 
I have a moral position on specific issues. But leave it to you to judge Modi.  CNN IBN poll done by GFK mode across 6 cities: Mumbai, Delhi, Ahmedabad, Lucknow, Kolkata, Chennai. Sample size: 1250.  Sometimes when I see responses to Gujarat verdict on my timeline, wonder if we are losing a great human quality: empathy. 
We will put all poll findings on our website  and Prof Suhas Palshikar will take your qs in a webchat tomorrow.  poll confirms disconnect between the sensex and the street. Sensex may be up, street mood is down.  Coming up on India at 9: the story of Shakila Bano, lost 8 family members in Naroda Patiya massacre 
good to know that. We have put a lot of effort in android application.  CNN IBN urban India poll: majority believe the govt will survive till 2014.  My thanks to Goa CM Manohar Parikkar, who is proving to be perhaps the most dynamic CM in the country. 
CNN IBN-IBN 7-The Week survey: big win for Modi likely in Gujarat, his ratings higher than in 2007.  CNN IBN urban India poll: PM's performance in handling Coalgate rated poorly. Image crisis remains.  Every year, one intl sportsman from Goa gets the Dilip Sardesai award. 3 of the four years its gone to a footballer! 
For the record, am no critic of Modi but simply an observer of his politics: good, bad and ugly!  CNN IBN urban India poll: 67 per cent feel Mamata did the right thing by withdrawing support.  On national sports day, delighted this year's Dilip Sardesai award instituted by govt of Goa went to foootballer, Samir Naik 
So what do you think our Gujarat poll will say? Modi heading for shock defeat or Modi heading for landslide? 9 pm tonight.  CNN IBN urban India poll: massive thumbs down to PM's reforms.  10 pm: Justice and Gujarat. is there a sense of justice among riot victims at last? 
breaking at 6 on CNN IBN: have shell cos linked to Gadkari changed addresses again after Dept of Co enquiry? is another cover up on?  India at 9: IBN exclusive opinion poll across 6 cities. Does urban India give a thumbs up/thumbs down to PM's reforms?  India at 9: Should Kasab be hanged at the earliest? 
8.30 pm on CNN IBN: special reports from across US on Sandy Storm. 7 pm: Cyclone updates from Chennai  8 pm: The Last Word; is today's SC verdict on auction of natural resources a relief for UPA 2?  8pm: The Last word: comparing 84 and 2002. the wheels of justice in riot cases move too slowly? 
10.30 pm: Tharoor versus Modi: is the Gujarat CM out of line with his 50 cr girlfriend remark?  The Mamata interview:   I agree. It is brave police officers like Rahul Sharma and the SIT which has ensured some justice in Gujarat 
Battle for the States at 9 pm: who is winning the Battle for Gujarat? results of the CNN IBN-IBN7-The Week pre poll.  Aveek Sarkar one of the last of the true newspaper barons, someone committed to fine writing above all else.  In contrast to Gujarat, wheels of justice have moved very slowly in Delhi 84. Mass murderers still get away too easily. 
The Last word at 8 pm: Is it proper for an army chief who retired 5 months ago to call for parliament dissolution?  Ultimate high to see full justice done by a newspaper to a newsy interview. Thank you Telegraph! No wonder you are Kolkata's number 1 paper!  More than a 100 convicted in Gujarat riot cases now. The wheels of justice are slowly moving. 
chennai cyclone is Rajni! And he's been around for decades!!  Suprabhat! At Kolkata airport. Picked up Telegraph. CNN IBN Mamata iview 8 column front page lead with pics and credit! Wow!  Big news day: Kasab's death sentence upheld; Maya Kodnani becomes first BJP MLA to be convicted in Guj riots case. 
Weather in Delhi gorgeous: cool, gentle breeze. Good for the soul. Enjoy the day and stay safe.  For me, Mumbai will always be Bombay, and am sure Kolkata is Calcutta for many. names change, nostalgia remains! Gnight.  Happy Onam to all! What would journalism be without my pals in the newsroom from Kerala! 
Modi's 50 crore girlfriend remark was in very poor taste. Hardly befits someone who aspires to be PM.  would love to interview Sonia. Last interviewed her in 2005. Can you put in a word?  Cong BJP at war at home; PM is in Teheran, Gadkari is holidaying in Canada. Out of sight, out of mind! Gnight. 
we come up with seats in our post poll. In pre poll, we give trends and vote share. More accurate we believe.  Saw Mamata's paintings! Good to know netas have time for art and music!  chief guest was Sachin Pilot, easily among the brightest young netas, though knowing Cong party that might get him in trouble. 
Cyclone approaching Chennai, super storm hits New York: weather day's top story. Will wash away our netas from headlines!  yes. Mocambo!  yes, there was a young environmentalist from Meghalaya who is helping save the forests among the winners 
Suprabhat. Will Narendra Modi score a resounding hat trick? CNN IBN IBN 7 The Week pre poll survey on Gujarat at 9 pm.  Impressed with Writers building, much cleaner than pan stained Mantralaya in Mumbai.  Politics is ageing, but rest of India is getting younger. Among the winners Arjun Vajpayi who climbed Everest at 16. 
thank you. We miss you on poll days my friend! And yes, Dr Palshikar has a rare quality for tv: quiet wisdom!  Had a drink with colleagues at Mogambo at Park street. Am told it was an 'in' place in Kolkata's rousing 60s!  Delighted to meet archer Deepika Kumari; she may have lost in the Olympics, but her spirit is undaunted. Will be a medalist one day. 
Bharatiya Janata Purti versus Indian National 'Con'gress! Guess voters have limited choices! Gnight.  Lot of you asking about Mamata iview. It repeats at midnight and 12 noon tomw on CNN IBN, 9.30 am on IBN 7.  Just attended the IBN network young Indian leader awards. Met some fine young minds who give hope for the future. 
Big takeaway emerging from Himachal poll: it's anti incumbency of state govt vs anti incumbency of centre.  8 pm: the last word: PM at 80: should there be a retirement age for netas?  Correct question at 8 on Last word: could the CAG report develop into a second Bofors for the Cong and provide BJP a fresh shot at power? 
Gadkari cancels his Himachal campaign tomorrow. Guess its a little cold for him?!  10 pm: Face the Nation: Teens kill a toddler for a mobike. Focus on rising teenage crime  7.30pm: homecoming of our under 19 stars. 
The rebel factor could decide Himachal. Not surprisingly, LPG kerosene hike matters more than corruption.  will repeat at midnight!  India at 9: should the UPA govt seek a trust vote in parliament? 
CNN IBN-IBN 7-The Week survey: neck and neck in Himachal, slight edge for BJP.  #Mamata to CNN IBN: I don't want to be a PM, but I will be the ladder to help decide the next leader!  8 pm: The Last Word: Is Coal report the BJP's Bofors moment all over again? 
Yes, yogendra will continue to do political analysis like he did just now on Karan's show. But no more pollstering.  have asked her on failures in Bengal and calling her enemies 'Maoists', incl the walkout!!  10 pm on CNN IBN: Coal classroom: explaining coal report in simple terms. If you have questions, log onto  
poll done by CSDS and Lokniti, still the best team of political pollsters in the country by some distance.  Full interview with #Mamata on CNN IBN 9 pm. Also, on IBN 7.  #Indiapositive today on CNN IBN. Meet Manohar Aich, the pocket Indian Mr Universe. 
will miss my friend Yogendra Yadav on the poll tonight. Arvind Kejriwal's gain is our loss!  #Mamata to CNN IBN: I asked Sonia to save alliance on Sept 14. She did not reply.  new Indian saying: Koyle mein Kuch kaala hai, daal nahin, sab maalamaal hai! Gnight. 
10 pm: has the cong really effected a generational change? Jyotir Scindia and Sachin Pilot on Face the Nation.  #Mamata to CNN IBN: This is a govt of corruption, by corruption, for corruption. FDI is to divert attention from Coalgate  One party says CAG has no mandate; the other says 'mota maal' made. Made for each other? 
India at 9: The results of the CNN IBN-IBN7-The Week pre poll survey on Himachal.  #Mamata to CNN IBN: UPA using threat of CBI over Mulayam and Mayawati.  if a parliament debate is of little use, should we shut down parliament? 
also at 1 pm: Should Adhir Ranjan Chaudhary with murder charges in the past against him have been made a minister?  #Mamata to CNN IBN: Cong wants to deliver populist budget and call elections in 2013 after budget session. people will reject them.  Shyama Prasad Mookerjee and Jawaharlal Nehru, both outstanding parliamentarians, must be turning in their grave. 
top story at 1 on CNN IBN: Hurricane Sandy in the US. Many Indian families with relatives on east coast worried.  #Mamata to CNN IBN: UPA has lost moral right to rule, they must go to the people.  Coming up: Shabana Azmi among others joins us in a spl tribute to AK Hangal. face the nation spl. 
Yogendraji has 'retired' from poll predictions, but the team at CSDS is still very much in place.  #Mamata to CNN IBN: Cong-led UPA is running on money, muscle and mafia power.  Well, removed his mike I guess would be more apprporiate! 
TONIGHT 9 pm: Battle for the States: the CNN IBN-IBN 7-The Week pre poll survey. Today, Himachal results, tomw Gujarat!  #Mamata to CNN IBN: I am happy to be part of a federal front of CMs. That is the future.  Ashwini Kumar of Cong 'walks out' of Karan Thapar's Last Word debate saying he wasnt given enough time! 
Suprabhat! Cabinet reshuffle over, time for the real thing: elections. Mantris don't win elections, voters do!  Break in interview because lights went out! Oh Kolkata!!  10 pm: Face the nation: a spl tribute to AK Hangal: an era when theatre 'created' stars for films. 
On now on CNN IBN: Vijay Amritraj with supermodel Cindy Crawford.  Interviewing Mamata Banerjee. First interview since she withdrew support. Running excerpts now. Full interview at 9 pm on CNN IBN  India at 9: is it now all-out war between the PM and the BJP? The Big coal debate. 
Sunday prime on CNN IBN: 10 pm: southern stars with Shobhana, 10.30 pm: the CJ show. 8 pm: Cyrus, 7.30: best of F 1.  Big question: will Prithviraj Chavan, the one honest CM Maharashtra has had after years, be sacrificed for his honesty?  India at 9: is it now all-out war between the PM and the BJP? The Big coal debate. 
8.30 pm: Devils advocate: former Chief Justice JS Verma on the 'conspiracy of silence' amongst netas on corruption.  Netas forget in era of RTIs/ PILs/ competitive media/whistleblowers, there is no place to hide. Chacha got away, bhatija might not!  8 pm: The Last Word: Karan Thapar dissects the PM's coal defence with a spl panel. 
Tonight on India at 9: cabinet reshuffle: is it really an image makeover, or old wine in a new bottle?  Truth of M'tra 'crisis' coming out: NCP wants Chavan to be removed/'reined in'. Ie. turn a blind eye to corruption.  Bibek Debroy: our cricket is under 19, politics over 90! No wonder we're better at cricket than netagiri! Gnight. 
Maken did a fine job at sports. But sadly when you try to bring too many changes too soon, the 'system' strikes back.  And yes, today is Dr Manmohan Singh's birthday too! Happy bday! Guess life for a neta begins at 80!  Replug: southern stars. A new series on CNN IBN. Our first guest: Prakash Raj. 10 pm. And don't miss: Assam: split wide open at 9.30. 
An alert viewer now points out that Salman's father, Khursheed Alam Khan was also EAM! Father and son! could be a KBC question!  actually, my caller tune is not KK, but MR!  there's a little bit of cricket in all of us! 
And even before Bakht, there was MC Chagla in 1966! So much for my GK!!  Suprabhat. Happy bday Devsaab! Thank you for the memories and yes, my caller tune!  carpet coverage on the channel from 8 am to 2.30 pm with the cricket win providing the one break! 
Correction: Khursheed not first Muslim to become EAM. That 'honour' goes to Sikandar Bakht in Vajpayee's 13 day govt in 1996.  you are right. It's contractor raj in most states today.  both you and should watch CNN IBN before passing false comments. 
Jitender Singh, Rahul Gandhi's key aide, is the new sports minister. Bansal railways.  Why does everyone in Maharashtra want to be irrigation minister? Because it is a 'wet' ministry! Gnight.  Karan Thapar attacks BJP when he interviews a BJP leader; attacks Cong when he iviews a Cong leader. That's good journalism. 
Coming up week that wasn't at 1.30. Time for me to go for a fish curry rice lunch. Can't lose my Sunday snooze! Bye  Girish Kuber of Loksatta on CNN IBN: Maharashtra govt is of the contractors, by the contractors and for the contractors!  7.30 pm: CNN IBN tracks the stars of the future on a day of the under 19 win. (watch out for Baba Aparajit!) 
Manish Tewari minister of state indep charge in I and B. he will still be there on tv I guess!!  yes, white papers should be called 'whitewash' papers!  3.30 and 8.30 pm: Devils Advocate: Karan Thapar quizzes former finance minister Yashwant Sinha on Coalgate politics. 
you are very kind. Wish it could have been on any day other than Sunday morning!  Sharad Pawar to CNN IBN: Ajit Pawar has done the right thing; no need for any other minister to resign  If the Cong is angry with Arvind, and so is the BJP, then he must be doing something right! A people's agent maybe? 
Of the list on #IBNnews last night, 20 of the 22 names were there. Decent strike rate!!  10 pm: face the nation: is Barfi the right choice for the Oscars?  earlier, the Cong called Arvind a BJP agent. Now, that he is taking on both Cong and BJP, wonder what they will call him. 
13 new ministers of state, 2 ministers with indep charge and seven cabinet to be sworn in. 22 in all  The Last Word at 8 pm: why are ex servicemen disappointed with the govt's 2300 crore package?  Arvind is now a full fledged politician. Which is the way it should be. Exciting times ahead. 
Seven new cabinet ministers: K Rahman Khan, Dinshaw Patel, Pallam Raju, Ajay Maken, Ashwini Kumar, Harish Rawat, Chandresh Katoch.  India at 9: is Pawar family and NCP facing a credibility crisis on corruption issue? Sam Pitroda is newsmaker on his twitter PC.  Two hours ago, we were celebrating India's world cup win; now, it's off the radar. Today's news is the next hour's history! 
Scindia and Pilot also likely to be MOS with independent charge.  Miss the Mumbai monsoon, but relish the Delhi autumn/winter. need a bit of both to keep spirits up! Have a good day folks!  Team Arvind has mastered tv: a few 100 people, street protests, gherao, tear gas: breaking news for hours! 
Manish Tewari big mover: to be made MOS with independent charge. No such big move for either Scindia or Pilot so far.  After 18 years in Delhi, now I know why the British spent summers in Shimla but rushed back every October to the plains.  haven't seen Kiran Bedi at today's rally? Any reason why? 
Will take your questions on the reshuffle during the live show from 11 am. Just send them to  Suprabhat! Smell of early winter in the air. Can't wait for October an the changing of seasons in Delhi.  Arvind Kejriwal: Cong and BJP two sides of the same coin. Gadkari and PM's house targeted. 
Week that Wasn't is at 9.30 am this morning ahead of the reshuffle. Guess we all need a bit of laughter in our lives!  sorry, T 20 world cup! Can't get IPL out of the mind!!  World champions in junior and senior cricket! How cool is that! Unmukt Chand take a bow!! 
Suprabhat. Not the best Sunday morning! Have to be on IBN 7 at 10 am and CNN IBN from 11 to give Gyaan on cabinet reshuffle!  T 20 IPL world cup winners decided. Not India, SL, NZ, Aus, Eng, PAK, WI, SA. it's the rains that have won ! Gnight.  Hangal did many fine roles in theatre. Helped build IPTA. And yet, power of cinema means best remembered for a small role in Sholay. 
Late night update: Ashwini Kumar law, Jitender Singh sports, Scindia corporate affairs.  T 20 IPL world cup winners decided. Not India, SL, NZ, Aus, Eng, PAK, WI, SA. it's the rains that have won ! Gnight.  Now to watch India win the junior world cup cricket! Have a restful Sunday. Bye 
Late night cab update: Khursheed may get MEA, Chiranjeevi tourism, Pawan Bansal rail, Moily petroleum, Jaipal science and tech. Gnight!  live on CNN IBN. When we record earlier, we run a recorded bug.  you are correct. He played Ramu Kaka in a film Amardeep. In Sholay, role was played by Satyen Kappu. 
Tharoor likely to get tourism, Pilot sports, Scindia corporate affairs. #IBNnews  Have great regard for Arvind Kejriwal's intent and integrity. Looking forward to his 'Aam admi' party!  AK Hangal: itna sannata kyun cha Gaya hai? RIP 
Come back Abhishek Manu Singhvi: all is forgiven!! Gnight, my lamb awaits!  there are a couple of guests who move from channel to channel! Would love to have a Sonia versus Advani debate!  AK Hangal: Ramu Kaka is no more. RIP. 
breaking: Shashi Tharoor set to make comeback to ministry. Well deserved.#IBNnews  terrible Assam floods have been a headline all day on CNN IBN with Arijit Sen reporting.  Now watching: Vijay Amritraj interviewing Pierce Brosnan on CNN IBN! Redefining 'cool'! 
Breaking: Manish Tewari to join council of ministers. Now who will we debate every night with?!  we are an 'interruptus' society: when Manish and Piyush are in full flow feel like a cop in speeding traffic!  very perceptive piece by an old colleague Kishalay Bhattacharjee of NDTV. must read.  
I and b minister, likely.  Arvind Kejriwal to CNN IBN: expect some announcement on political party on Oct 2. full interview at 9 pm  replug: our award winning journo Arijit Sen's brilliant news docu Assam: split wide open. 8.30 pm Sat, Sunday 12 noon and 9.30 
Off for my traditional Bakri Eid dinner. Mary had a little lamb; in a little while, she won't! Gnight.  Arun Shourie says Gujarat model of Modi proves tough reforms are politically sustainable. But why doesnt national BJP follow Guj model?  Nanporia, Frank Moraes and Sham Lal: a troika of 'wise', scholarly old style TOI editors. RIP. 
Cab reshuffle: Andhra is the big gainer. Will have as many as 10 ministers. Is this a prelude to a Telangana announcement?  10 pm: Face the nation: Walmart boon or bane: viewer questions through   One of the grand old editors of Times of India NJ Nanporia passed away. Not sure TOI even carried the item?! 
Do watch the depression episode I just retweeted. Proof that serious medical issues still have space on news tv.  India at 9: newsmakers: Arun Shourie and Arvind Kejriwal. Talking pt: can good economics be put above bad politics?  Nemo wants to walk in the park again. My dog is redefining the master-dog equation. He calls the shots! Enjoy a rainy weekend. 
Long day of speculation ahead. For the latest and accurate information, track and . Bye!  8 pm: The Last Word: Have the protests against the anti-Islam film become an overreaction?  On IBN 7 Zindagi live, on IBN Lokmat Great Bhet. In our small way, we are trying to redefine quality weekend programming on IBN Network. 
Cab reshuffle: will Shivraj Patil make dramatic comeback in MEA?Or will it be Anand Sharma/Sibal? #IBNnews  Tottenham win: son happy! India win! We're all happy! Great way to end Super Sunday! Gnight.  We are trying to create space for 'positive' news. Lots of truly inspiring stories around us. 
Cab reshuffle: Kamal Nath may get parliamentary affairs, Ghulam Nabi too in railways race.#IBNnews  If you have questions for Anil, Aakash, log onto  They will take them on air on CNN IBN at 11 pm  when Ben Johnson was caught doping, felt cheated. With Lance, one feels sympathy. 
Cab reshuffle: Harish Rawat, KM Muniyappa, Ajay Maken to be elevated as cab ministers. #IBNnews  maybe Anil Kumble should come out of retirement, leave our studio and go and play. Will pick up a five for against England!  #Indiapositive at 1.30 and at 9.30 have truly uplifting stories. Wish we could start an India positive/cit journo channel! 
Cab reshuffle: Harish Rawat, KM Muniyappa, Ajay Maken to be elevated as cab ministers. #IBNnews  most Bharat Ratnas have been posthumous. We remember legends after they pass on!  can anyone have a southern stars series without Rajni? 
Cab reshuffle: AH Khan Chaudhary, MP from Bengal, gets call up. Bengal quota! #IBNnews  you bet. My old man often said that England played spin like blind men in a dark alley.  Weekends on CNN IBN: #Indiapositive, (citizen journalist show), week that wasn't, now showing, living it up and more. 
Cab reshuffle latest: Ajay Maken gets call up for cabinet rank. CP Joshi set to be railways minister #IBNnews  SOS: come back Kevin Pietersen. All is forgiven!  Don't miss: 30 mins. Assam: split wide open. Arijit Sen's powerful news docu on CNN IBN. 8.30 pm sat, 12 noon and 9.30 sun. 
On CNN IBN's southern stars: Shobhana (12 noon and 8 pm). On Dimensions: Cindy Crawford with Vijay Amritraj (2 and 10pm)  Formula one on one channel, cricket on another, football on a third. live sport is the ultimate drug of our times! Gnight.  Southern stars: Prakash Raj at 12 noon and 8 pm Saturday, repeats tomorrow.  
Don't miss: real life story of a Lavani artist. IBN Lokmat's great bhet at 9.30 pm with Nikhil Wagle.  Somehow, Liverpool vs United and Man city vs Arsenal seems more exciting than the cricket!  Spl series begins on CNN IBN: celebrating southern cinema, perhaps for the first time on 'national' tv. Don't miss southern stars. 
a mango man is a state of mind, not only of income!  Sunday prime on CNN IBN: 7.30: Hugh Hefner. 8: Cyrus, 8.30: Montek, 9.30: Rushdie, 10.30: Nagarjuna, 1130: t20 review. Pretty eclectic!  Weekend spls on CNN IBN: Pierce Brosnan is Vijay Amritraj's guest. 12.30 and 10 pm, Sun 10 am and 7.30. Not sure who is the real Bond! 
Reshuffle at 11.30 am tomorrow. Musical chairs for the khaas aadmi. Mango men like you and me can enjoy the weekend. Bye  Anil Kumble, Akash Chopra analyzing England vs India now on CNN IBN.  Suprabhat. It's still drizzling in Delhi; nothing like the early morning smell of rain to lift spirits. 
Cong is a tough party to cover for a reporter. Very secretive. BJP on the other hand loves and lives by the media!  yup. Gulzar, Hrishida, Bimal Roy, Guru Dutt, all masters of cinema.  A month ago, we were reporting on drought. Now, floods in deserts of Rajasthan. Such is life! Gnight. 
CNN IBN's Pallavi Ghose on top of the reshuffle story. Easily the best tv reporter covering the Cong today.  loved Pan Singh Tomar too.  If twitter trends won elections, Swamy would be pm! Not sure how many twitterati have voter ID cards though! 
Looks like we're in for a major reshuffle. Soni, Wasnik heading back to Cong party, Sahay, Krishna out. All too late?  maybe it's a generation gap! Just watch Abhimaan, Namak Haram, Guddi, Chupke Chupke etc and you will know what I mean.  wow! You listened to Lokmanya Tilak's voice? That's pretty special. 
Suprabhat and Eid Mubarak to all.  Final word on Barfi: Darjeeling has never looked more beautiful!  To credit of Dr Swamy, at least he takes questions. Cong leadership still silent and inaccessible 
Just wish political drama didn't happen late on Friday nights. Or cab reshuffles on Sunday mornings! C'est la vie! Gnight.  well, Kahani is still my movie of the year.  For twitter groupies, no questions to be asked to Dr Swamy. So what if he didn't win in apex court, he wins in cyberspace! 
In our haste to be first with the news, we need to first be correct with it. Lesson for all of us in news tv.  it is a nice film, but Oscars? Not sure.  Excerpts from my webchat on   
Am told some channels ran Gadkari resigns as breaking news: guess concept of breaking news has 'broken down'!  Too many of our new gen film makers get trapped in style. Need a Hrishikesh Mukherjee crash course.  Ok folks.. webchat on  in a few minutes. Happy to take questions. log onto  
I don't run khap panchayats sadly at 9. Give the news and opinion and leave it to you the viewer to decide.  Just watched Barfi. Beautifully filmed and acted: just wish the story/script had been stronger.  sorry for not doing the webchat today. will aim to do it on Monday at 5 pm 
Yes, No indication property undervalued, but rates up by 40 times in three years. So, someone knew Bikaner was high value.  Best news show this Sun: Week that Wasn't. Kunal as Malawati, Kaneez as Cong spokesperson! 10.30 am, 2.30 and 8 pm on CNN IBN.  10 pm: Worldview with Suhasini Haider. The big stories of the week from across the world. 
Kya karen boss! cong agent one day, BJP agent the next. I actually am an agent. of my kids! their wish is my command!  Best column this Sunday: Shankar Aiyar in Sunday Standard on PM speech. Have retweeted link.  India at 9: Subramanium Swamy is our newsmaker. Talking pt: is a snap poll the only way out of the present impasse? 
770 hectares of land acquired by Vadra in Bikaner. This is based on documents with us at CNN IBN. could be more.  Best news feature this Sunday: Sunday Express story on how father and son combined to make Cheteshwar Pujara an India player.  8 pm: The Last Word: democracy or anarchy: what has the last week meant for the country's image? 
Buzz: Rahul Gandhi to be Cong working president?  Must read: Salman Rushdie's memoir Joseph Anton. Enjoying it immensely. Rushdie iview repeat on CNN IBN at 9.30 pm  coming up at 6 pm: our reporters on the flood-like situation in several parts of north India today.. 
Ambika and Wasnik offer to quit, Krishna resigns: is this a Kamaraj plan 2012?  Buzz in Delhi: Cab reshuffle either Tues or Sat. Chiranjeevi, Deepa Das Munshi, Vilas Muttemwar, Tariq Anwar among new faces.  thanks, didnt know that. Yes, my old man's first hundred was 200 not out against NZ. think Kambli scored highest debut 100? 
10 pm: worldview: how the Indian American community sees Rajat Gupta's case? Whose ahead in the Obama Romney battle?  Maalishwala says India's bowling not good enough to win T 20 world cup. Will have to take his word !  Milind Deora account temporarily 'suspended' not for hate speech, but for 'verification'! 
India at 9: Gadkari vs Vadra: who is better at handling corruption allegations: Cong or BJP?  We thought it was a T 20 world cup, turning out to be a T 10 world cup. Next time: 5 over games? Gnight.  Swamy is a cat with many lives. Picture Abhi baaki hai 
The Last Word at 8 pm: Should Rahul Gandhi join the govt, and is time to weed out the entire UPA old guard?  Amitabh Bachchan on Kaun Banega Crorepati. just gets better with age. Also, loving India's got Talent. Lots to watch.  cops get shunted out, nothing happens to the netas. Patnaik is a fall guy. 
please do  Loving Kevin Pietersen on T 20 analysis. Tournament a damp squib, but Pietersen made for tv.  Garam coffee, nan khatai biscuit, newspaper and rain. Subah ho to aisi. Bye 
breaking on CNN IBN: 3 more alleged shell cos of Gadkari: all listed as sugar cos but which have done no transactions in last 3 years.  Cyrus, Kunal, Kaneez and team at their very very best on Week That wasn't this week. You guys rock!  When Bombay Burned is a UBS publication. Out of stock, but may get in old book store. There were book stores before Flipkart! 
breaking on CNN IBN: How Robert Vadra went on a land buying spree in Rajasthan soon after a Cong govt took over.  why has Anna's Man Friday, Suresh Pathare, resigned and left Anna? What's going on?  Gyaan for the day: observe self-restraint on twitter, all will be well. Have a good day. 
Gadkari is 'indisposed', Vadra is 'missing'! And for us 'mango men' it's another day in office. Have a great day!  Mulayam was speaking to Prabhu Chawla on Teekhi Baat on IBN 7.  If you ever want to know what really happened in Mumbai 92-93, pick up a book When Bombay Burned, written by our then reporting team at TOI 
Breaking on CNN IBN: Gadkari's driver and personal staff were 'directors' on 26 companies. Would rotate every 3 years.  Mulayam throws a googly: tells IBN 7 he will support a Mamata resolution against retail FDI in parliament. The fun has begun!  yes, the column is translated in Bhaskar and 6 other languages. only way to reach out to more. 
Haryana govt gives Vadra clean chit, Min of company affairs gives Gadkari two weeks to explain. Interesting?!  Money doesn't grow on trees, but it's branches are 'underground'! Have a restful weekend!  after 24 years in journalism (6 in print, 18 in tv), still get excited by a byline in print. 
love Mumbai in monsoon, Dilli in autumn.  La Martinere faculty getting clean chit in Rawla case is headline on CNN IBN.  my Hindustan Times column: Tinderbox Mumbai: 1992 to 2012. feedback welcome.  
Didn't see some of India's biggest newspapers that are quick to expose neta corruption take up Zee-Jindal story on page one. Wonder why?!  #Indiapositive at 1.30 pm and citizen journalist show at 9.30 pm. News beyond politics!  Suprabhat. Dark clouds, light drizzle, smell of rain; hey, we have a monsoon in Delhi too! 
Suprabhat! Blissful October autumn morning. there is no place like Dilli in October.  Weekend spl on CNN IBN: Playboy guru Hugh Hefner speaks to Vijay Amritraj at 10 pm! Break from politics!  First, coal blocks, now it's twitter blocks! Too many blockheads around. Time to get off before someone blocks me! Gnight 
Time to play with my dog. He and my driver only people who listen to me (and my driver isn't a company director!)Gnight.  weekend on CNN IBN: Nagarjuna on southern stars 12 noon and 8 pm; Rushdie spl 4 pm; Worldview 11.30 am and 8.30 pm, ICC awards 12.30  We need to convict a few for hate speech. And stop censorship. Till then, all this noise is simply that, noise. 
next week is our opinion poll on Himachal and Gujarat on IBN 7 and CNN IBN.  Sat morning mood in the park: UPA needs to do more to get economy on track; BJP needs to be less disruptive.  I agree. Many of us tv anchors can become arrogant under the arclights.its a statutory warning for us. 
If complaint of criminal conduct/corruption is proven, the regulator must have power to suspend our licence.  Suprabhat. PM is speaking again this morning at 9 am on eco growth. Making up for months of khamoshi !!  Politicians like Thackeray and Shahi Imam have engaged in hate speech for years. Why have they never been convicted? 
Some of you feel 'we' are 'paid media', we are corrupted. You should have an indep regulator to take your complaint too.  Will Walmart provide Old Monk at discounted prices? Am sure my local corner shop will win out! Gnight  certainly, no north block bureaucrat should decide what is hate speech. Law of the land and courts should. 
Agree with Justice Katju media needs more accountability. Have an independent regulator like Ofcom in Britain.  yes, Pallavi Ghosh is easily the best reporter when it comes to getting news out of Cong/PMO.  I disagree with likes of Kanchan Gupta, he can be vicious, abusive and personal. But will defend his right to free speech (not hate speech) 
no. I don't like those fights on tv. We need more light, less heat. Media corruption is a serious issue.  Well done to the magnificent team at CNN IBN, on and off air. A well deserved weekend drink is called for!  Sorry for retweeting praise. Guess need a break from the daily dose of hate mail!! 
Need to see my doc tomorrow. Handling debates on India at 9 is becoming injurious to my health.  thank you. Let's hope there are more viewers like you out there. Who doesn't like a bit of praise?  Story of the day: my colleague Priyanka Gupta's report from Chirang on young kids dying in Assam's relief camps. 
well he played for Mumbai between 1960 and 73 and never lost a Ranji Trophy in 13/14 years. was very proud of that.  Just retweeted 2 comments to reveal the hazards of pleasing all. Being an anchor not easy!  Karan Thapar just did a first rate debate on coal on The Last Word. The kind we should be having in parliament, not in tv studios! 
Yes, there will be a party in heaven with fish curry and feni! and of course, cricket talk!  which is why Modi's opposition to FDI in retail is surprising. He is one of the few CMs who has packaged reforms artfully.  dont think twitter ideal medium to answer 5 qs. anyone wants to ask qs, open house on fridays in my office at 11.30 am 
Great when legends of the past are honoured. Pity it happens after they pass away! c'est la vie!  UP next: MMS 6 point strategy for survival.  10 pm: Face the Nation: Sonia in Forbes top 10 power women. Does young India identify with her at all? 
Spl day for my old man; Sardesai,Mankad, Merchant,Manjrekar, Phadkar, Jaisimha, Ghulam Ahmed being honoured for services to Indian cricket.  Up next: Udayan Mukherjee tells me why markets are reacting the way they are. CNN IBN special on UPA's battle for survival.  India at 9: newsmaker: Arun Jaitley. Talking pt: has the govt overreacted to twitter? Spl focus: Is Arup Patnaik a fall guy? 
Sunil Gavaskar to get lifetime achievement CK Nayudu award. cant think of someone more deserving.  at 6 pm, will give you a break up of MPs, down to the last individual, including independents.  The Last word at 8 pm: the parliament standoff: is there any way to end the impasse? 
10 pm: face the nation: Gadkari case: time to overhaul relations between business and politics?  Will take your tweets and messages live. So if you have questions, comments, do send.  well done India under 19. As always, it requires sporting success to lift the doom and gloom! 
India at 9: Zee vs Jindal extortion case: time for media to introspect? Also, whose in, whose out of the cabinet?  what is PM's six point strategy for survival. Find out at 6 pm on CNN IBN.  No parliament, gheraos by Team Anna, no work, economy sliding: Perfect recipe for 'Annarchy'! 
The Last Word at 8 pm: is Rajat Gupta sentence a lesson for us in India? diff between US and Indian justice systems?  Friday evening: 6 pm onwards: UPA's battle for survival. Will try and explain all the twists and turns. Long evening ahead  so, its official now: no work this week in parliament. Over 100 bills pending. does anyone care? 
Suprabhat. Very very sad news this morning: comedian Jaspal Bhatti dies in a road accident. Was a great funster. RIP.  8.30 is KBC, 9 pm: India at 9: guess PM is better off giving speech at 8pm!!  Rohit asked to play on tough wickets abroad and Raina for home conditions? 
This Dassehra, don't miss #indiapositive awards. 9.30 pm CNN IBN. We could all do with positive influences in our lives!  PM to address nation at 8 pm. Address likely in Hindi. FDI in retail to be explained to aam admi?!  so one day form decides test selection? And Rahane who averages more than 60 gives way to Raina? Crazy. 
The pujo spl brings alive the great traditions of the culture of Bengal and more. May these traditions live forever.  Dinesh Trivedi says he wont accompany Trinamool ministers to withdraw support. But then he isnt a minister any longer!!  can anyone tell me why Rohit Sharma who was the replacement batsman in Australia not even spoken about now? 
Super pujo special by my colleague Priyanka Gupta and our Kolkata bureau. Must watch. On now. rpt at 6.30.  Hard work of our political reporters. Like to believe they are best in the field! 24 x 7 on top of the news.  that's because, sadly, the 'kids' are no longer kids! Guess we all grow 'old', kids too! 
reshuffle likely on Sunday/Monday. Lets see whose the joker in the pack this time!  Long day ahead. The good news? Its Friday. The bad news? Mamata doesnt believe in weekends! enjoy the fun!  Suprabhat. Got up early to do one of the great joys of parenthood after a long time: drop the 'kids' to school! 
Suprabhat. Vijayadashmi kee Hardik shubhkamnayen. May good conquer evil in all our minds and hearts.  PM may address the nation today. Cab reshuffle next week; more reforms too; Telangana may happen. Wow! we have a govt!  takkar was an enjoyable dishoom dishoom film! 
It's raining the night before Dassehra! Guess the weather has decided to clean our system! Gnight.  MY Hindustan Times column: an open letter to Mamatadi. feedback welcome.   Phase out reservations, promote diversity, reduce quotas, promote affirmative action. Possible? Gnight. 
yes, but jo pakda Gaya woh phas Gaya!  Suprabhat. From 3.30 pm today, we officially have a minority govt. PM goes back to the Narasimha Rao era!  yes, the Sikh priests at Joshimath gurudwara have done the nation proud. 
When we debate Gadkari, we are asked what about Vadra, when we debate Vadra we are asked what about Gadkari? C'est la vie.  we hope to be in UK and the world soon. Till then, ibnlive live feed is your window to India.  Dalit bahujan activist Chandrabhan Prasad did a survey which showed Dalits virtually absent from newsrooms. Why? 
Gadkari has much to answer, but Cong Virbhadra Singh is an open and shut case. How come no inquiry for 2 years?  Next time, a Bandh should be only on Friday. Better a long weekend than a mid week disruption? Gnight.  Believe reservations in promotions would be disastrous, but still must ask: why do so few Dalits make it to top positions in pvt sector? 
agreed, but what about the shell companies and the invts therein? Surely that needs an explanation?  let's not create a Hyderabad Telangana break up over biryani! Just enjoy it!  Day's image: Muslims being invited to perform namaaz in a gurdwara in Joshimath because of the heavy rain. Who says idea of India is dead? 
Face the Nation at 10 pm: Are noise pollution restrictions routinely violated during festivals?  would make a terrible politician, have a very thin skin. Get even affected by twitter abuse! Happy to be a journo!  What came first as a divisive device, caste or reservation? That's Prof Vivek Kumar again on India at 9. 
India at 9: Gadkari under scanner: is the BJP prez an embarrassment for his party? Also: best of the Obama-Romney debate  missed out on the Qubani ka meetha. Next time!  Merit is an upper caste sham! That's Prof Vivek Kumar of JNU on the reservations in promotion debate on India at 9 
The Last Word at 8 pm: has Britain begun the process of rehabilitating Modi globally?  we try and give news without the noise, sense without sensationalism, not easy in these 'churnalism' times!  10 pm: face the nation: Mumbai's top cop in line of fire: is political interference ruining policing? 
Ram J to CNN IBN; Gadkari should step down as BJP president. He has compromised BJP's anti corruption campaign..  nizami culture will be hopefully part of a multi cultural Telangana or not? Or you don't want the biryani?  India at 9: will reservations in promotion for SC/STs in govt services destroy governance? 
Ashok Khemka to CNN IBN: cover up going on in Vadra case. BJP covers up Gadkari, Cong covers up Vadra? Guess Kejriwal big winner?  arre boss, biryani is a good old Hyderabadi delight and I trust Hyderabad will be capital of Telangana?  News 360 at 8.30: left to die in Indore: why MP police needs to wake up. 
The trolls have taken over my timeline. Time to get off. Shubho Navmi!  that is very kind of you. All credit to the passion for news in the team at the IBN network.  8 pm: The Last Word with Karan Thapar: has coal report and parliament descended into an endless tu tu main main? 
journalists can only do so much. It is now for ministry of company affairs to take forward. And maybe BJP to introspect.  Had a super Telangana lunch today. Very spicy, but they sure know how to make their biryani and mirchi ka salan!  Subah Gayatri mantra Padho, din mein gaali do, raat ko nafrat paida karo! Good luck to such twitterati! Enjoy the day. 
I agree. But who will bell the cat? We had exposed Bhujbal/Tatkare in similar cases. They still remain mantris.  reshuffle is still a week away.  I agree. Patnaik acted like a responsible cop in a very difficult situation. 
full marks to you and NDTV for taking this up first. Well done!  breaking: Andhra governor meets Sonia Gandhi. is statehood for Telangana the next big story?  Now, we're called anti Hindu media! Guess some people feel they have the monopoly over Hinduism. Good luck! 
Now my driver wants to join Gadkari. Says he wants to be a company director! Have a good day!  Am glad the abandoned baby in Srinagar is being helped after we aired the story this morning. Makes it all worth it! #Indiapositive  Govt fails to handle Assam, blames social media for the mess. Need to find a better excuse folks for ineptitude. 
When I had raised these qs to Gadkari 15 days ago , he said he was a social entrepreneur. I want to be a social entrepreneur too!  sir, we can't reflect and remember every incident, every anniversary. We can only try our best.  RR Patil wants Arup Patnaik to be replaced as Mumbai CP. trust a neta to make a cop the fall guy. 
Gadkari case similar to several M'tra netas: they seem to have perfected art of the benami company.  in news, every day is a new day. Today, debate is Bandh politics, tomorrow we could be back to Coalgate!  My kids want to be MPs. It's like a school you attend at 11 am once in a while and leave by 11.15! Gnight. 
Suprabhat. Good morning to all. Not so good morning for Nitin Gadkari. More evidence emerging of his 'shell' companies.  Now: CNN IBN reports from Sikkim one year after the quake. We don't forget!  I agree auction is not always the best method. But we need to know why a reco for auction in 2004 was never acted upon. 
did an entire India at 9 with one mention of Kejriwal, no mention of Gadkari/Vadra. Call it a one day festive break! Gnight.  10 pm: face the nation: Has Anna Hazare let down Team Kejriwal?  Pumpkin of the day: Rajiv Shukla. Must learn to play Chinese whispers better! 
Javed Akhtar: dignity and decency were what Yash Chopra films stood for.  India at 9: Should bandhs be declared unconstitutional? also, violence in Islamabad; Help an abandoned baby in Srinagar  by the way, forgot to ask you: in last 8 years did BJD ever demand an auction of coal mines? Or did you prefer allotments too? 
Javed Akhtar says his favourite Yash Chopra film was Waqt. For me, it must be Deewaar. The best script ever!  8 pm: The Last word: is bandh politics justified?  I can promise you civility on CNN IBN debates. Viewers have to choose between civility and cacophony. 
10: 30 pm: the ten best songs/dialogues of Yash Chopra's films.  Am told Bharat Bandh is in support of the common man! The common man who wants a holiday I guess!  It is always amusing that the same politicians who refuse to debate in parliament happily do so in tv studios. Thank god! 
10 pm; Face the nation: "Aaadhar better way to fight corruption than OB van politics": spl interview with Nandan Nilekani.  #Suprabhat. Bharat Bandh! Didnt the supreme court declare bandhs unconstitutional?  Mr Prasad did threaten to walk out once if he was interrupted! But he, Khursheed and Panda do make a rare articulate trio 
India at 9: Is Vijay Mallya solely responsible for the KFA meltdown? also: Javed Akhtar on the Yash Chopra magic.  UPA ministers spotted at Ganesh puja. Guess they are getting ready to worship the BSP's elephant symbol soon! Gnight!  thank you. News versus noise, debate versus din, sense versus sensationalism. Glad you noticed the difference. 
8 pm: The Last Word; Do politicians seek to protect each other and their families when it comes to corruption?  Wonderful to watch Afghanistan play cricket. Couldn't have been an easy ride to get this far.  we also had an audio problem with Mr Pal's OB, so had to apologize. 
Suprabhat! Greetings to all on ashtami. May the festive spirit continue.  Modaks have arrived!! Life looks suddenly better!! Ganpati Bapa Morya!  Jagdambika Pal was on standby because Khursheed was late. Once Khursheed arrived, it made little sense to have 2 cong voices. 
well said. Swiss alps met Punjabi mustard fields in Yashji's films.  May see minor rollback in LPG and diesel, but FDI in retail stays. Not good enough for Mamata. She is now looking at a fourth front.  Impressive speech by Raj Thackeray. Hard hitting without being shrill. Someone has spoken for Mumbai's constabulary. 
Yash Chopra's cinema? Where anger met romance, where pine tree met the tulip! Gnight!  All over between Mamata and Centre. No rollback on FDI, no negotiations. Manmohan prepares for life without Mamata: enters 'Maya jaal'  7 pm: the big city story: Kids injured in Kolkata's most popular amusement park. 
The Swiss flag should fly at half mast: Yash Chopra made the Swiss Alps part of the great Indian love story.  Suprabhat! Ganpati Bappa Morya. Mangal Murti Morya. Ganesh Chaturthi chya Hardik Shubhekcha.  8 pm: The Last Word: Karan Thapar dissects the CAG report. 
Yash Chopra would come every year for the CNN IBN real heroes function. Attend it with a quiet dignity. We will all miss him.  you've made our day! Tech team has worked very hard on new ibnlive android app. The future!  10 pm: face the nation: the social media debate. 
From Deewaar to a Kabhie Kabhie, a Ittefaq to a Daag: forget king of romance, he was simply Badshah of good cinema. Yash Chopra: RIP.  Maa, Mati, Manush, Mamata, Mulayam, Maya, Modi, Manmohan. M going to sleep! Gnight  India at 9: is opposition justified in calling for PM resignation? Has Raj T come of age? Pak minister Rahman Malik is our newsmaker. 
And oh yes, Shubho saptami to all!  Amit Mitra to CNN IBN: did not see the poverty when I was FICCI secy general which I see today as a politician!  Rimjhim gire saawan! Never argue with the rain gods! Have a good day 
Glorious Sun morning: no tweeting, no tv. Listen to birds chirping, read a book, and sleep! Till tomorrow, bye!  Amit Mitra, now on India at 9, key player for Mamata. WB finance minister  yes, there is water logging, yes, there are traffic snarls. Think of the farmer waiting for rains! 
Replug: Lest we Forget: CNN IBN spl on Sino Indian war at 1.30 and 9.30. #indiapositive awards at 12 noon.  On now from 9 pm to 11 pm. Will take your tweet feedback too! Are we heading for an early election?  Suprabhat. Wonderful to be driving to office in rain. We finally have a monsoon in the capital! 
Suprabhat. Season of allegations: Digvijaya Singh tells CNN IBN he has 'evidence' against Vajpayee/Advani families, but won't use it.  Meaning: got my prediction at 9 am on twitter wrong, at 1 pm on air right!! so much for understanding Mamata!!  Sugar high! Cholestorol higher! Triglyceride highest! That's when you are a true Indian! Eat well, sleep better! Gnight. 
Kolkata has 10 day holiday for Pujo? In my next life want to live in Mamata's Bengal! Till then, it is good ol Dilli! Gnight  How about that?! for once, seem to have got my political prediction right!!  Delightful evening of Eid party hopping! A way to a man's heart is truly through the stomach! 
thank you. Yes, I had tears in my eyes too. It has taken 50 years for govt to recognise martyrs of 1962.  Long evening in studio! Courtesy Mamatadi! Could life be better?  10.30 pm: celebrating Eid with Salman Khan! 8.30: news 360: all the days news in 30 minutes. 
thank you. #indiapositive is a small step. Am sure many will take it forward. We are a great country.  Getting a sense that govt is preparing for life after Mamata. Maya in place of Mamata: sounds very 'Mulayam'?  10 pm: face the nation. The Indian Muslim dilemma: is there a reinvention of victim hood? 
thank you, am glad so many of you liked the prog on Sino Indian war. Lot of effort went into it. Rpt at 1.30 and 9.30 Sunday.  talking of current serving CMs.  India at 9: India for north east. We connect the country with voices from Guwahati to Bangalore, Delhi to Mumbai. 
Replug CNN IBN prime: Lest we Forget 8.30 on Sino Indian war, 9.30 Cit journo show, 10 pm: Jimmy Connors iview, 10.30 week that wasn't.  Should politicians be judged by number of days in office, or number of 'working' days in power? Have a good day folks.  8 pm last word: is it wise/viable to censor social media? 
On now: #indiapositive awards on CNN IBN. Must watch for those who believe India is only about negativism.  yes! Good one, Chamling of Sikkim is probably the longest serving CM at the moment?  Sachin Pilot to CNN IBN: all social sites, including Facebook and twitter, must subscribe to Indian laws. 
covering the Aadhar launch. It's one of the day's main news stories.  yes, Naveen Patnaik is over 5000 days in office. How did I forget him? Also, Ibobi Singh in Manipur?  How I wish every young school child was exposed to these great speeches, all available with the Films Division 
Mawa cake, chai and Shrewsbury biscuits! A Saturday morning to get rid of Friday depression. Enjoy the weekend.  And today is one year since Sikkim quake. Priyanka Gupta is reporting from Gangtok for CNN IBN.  We have Ambedkar's constitution speech in our docu on the great man. Real treasure. Listening to it is fascinating 
Must read: Shekhar Gupta on 62 war's untold story.   Sheila Dikshit has completed more than 5000 days, Gogoi is over 4000. Anyone else?  India beat Pakistan by one wicket in under 19 quarter finals! nothing like cricket to add to the festive spirit! 
Must watch: #indiapositive awards. 7 pm on CNN IBN. Who says there is no good news on tv?  Narendra Modi completes 4000 days as Gujarat chief minister today. Quite an achievement! Shouldn't that be trending?  Being Indian is having Mithai on Diwali, x mas pudding on Xmas, halwa on Nanak jayanti and Sewaiyan on Eid. Enjoy the day! 
Suprabhat! 50 years anniv of Sino Indian war. Don't miss Lest we Forget a CNN IBN spl 12 noon, 8.30 pm sat, 12, 9.30 pm sun.  Mamata, Modi, Mulayam, Mayawati, Manmohan: the 'M' factor in Indian politics that haunts us!  All day campaign on CNN IBN. India for north east. We are connecting the country in solidarity. 
Tired and depressed. All I can say is 'thank god it's Friday!'. Gnight.  have to be on CNBC at 9.40 am, CNN IBN at 10 am. Early start to what promises to be a long day.  Seviyan and milk early morning. Great way to start Eid. Thank you to my friend Aamir Raza Husain for an Eid treat! 
none of us are saints. Sadly.  Suprabhat. Will Mamata pull the plug? Methinks not, but then I often get it wrong!  Eid Mubarak all! May you have a joyous and peaceful Eid. And yes, an extended weekend!! 
Guess when we point one finger at others, four fingers will be pointed at us. Trial by media could become trial of media.  Any idea if the India Pak game being repeated on Star cricket? How do night owls like us watch the game?  Ending Sunday by listening to Kishore. Koi hamdam na raha! Music, book, sport: Sunday pleasures. Gnight. 
Sad to hear of Zee News bribe story. If true, it represents new low in our profession.  Not sure what else they share, but Narendra Modi and MF Husain share a birthday! It's all in the stars I guess! Gnight.  yes, we've just had our 1000th citizen journalist is a one of a kind show. Should have a cj channel one day! 
Every time I switch on Champions league cricket, it seems to rain. Guess even weather gods saying enough of cricket!  10 pm: Rushdie Uncensored. A spl with the author ahead of the launch of his memoirs. #Rushdie  you maybe right. Does take 24 hours to recover from Karims! 
Bhupen Chaube doing a fine job on India at 9. Also, on KBC as 'expert'. Time for us oldies to retire!  T 20 review with Harsha Bhogle and Aakash Chopra at 11 pm. Am told India loses to Pak in warm ups, wins the 'real thing'!  Read Grisham's The Confession, watched EPL and Eng vs South Africa. Perfect way to rest the mind from 'news'! 
8 pm on IBN 7: a special on 50 years of the Sino Indian war. Tomorrow is the 50th anniversary.  India at 9: Will Mamata pull out and bring down UPA 2? Why is Santosh Bagrodia key to coalgate? Lessons for India from Pak game  Been a quiet, lazy Sunday. Barely moved a bone! Could do with many more! 
appreciate Mr Kejriwal and Mr Gadkari for facing the questions. Mr Vadra, are you watching?!  The Last word at 8 pm: Has MMS silenced critics with big ticket reforms or endangered his govt?  repeat of Laxman show at 7.30 pm. Gulzar spl at 10 pm 
on IBN Lokmat: Nitin Gadkari answering Nikhil Wagle. Good to have a neta willing to take the tough questions.  Modi on bday is ordering eggless cake from Italian bakery in Ahmedabad! Have a good day! #HappyBdayNamo  Swami Aiyar: 'sadly, some people think that public sector waste is acceptable (read Coal India) while corruption is not. 
Kejriwal to CNN IBN: was not fully aware of Anjali Damania's land deals.  From Islam to intolerance; from living under a fatwa to marrying Padmalakshmi. Rushdie Uncensored. 10 pm CNN IBN. #rushdie  Must read: Swaminathan Aiyar in Sunday Times of India on why the time has come to end all discretionary allotments. 
10 pm: Worldview with Suhasini Haider. The best of the Obama-Romney debates. who is ahead?  Salman Rushdie says modern Islam has made jihad 'glamourous'. Watch the full Rushdie iview on CNN IBN at 10 pm #rushdie  Zindagi live on IBN 7: comedian special at 11 am and 8 pm. What does it take to be a stand up comedian? 
Last word at 8 pm: Karan Thapar looks at the JPC findings on 2 G. Has the PM much to answer?  Suprabhat. Have you wished Narendra Modi happy birthday this morning? I did!  Must read column on Sunday. Tavleen Singh in Indian Express on the CAG. Or are some constitutional bodies above scrutiny? 
on now: Bhupen Chaubey interviewing Arvind Kejriwal on CNN IBN. repeat India at 9. where is the anti-corruption mvt headed?  if you don't have a grandmum, need to invent/find one! Make life worth it! Have a great week ahead. Gnight.  4 pm on CNN IBN: Golden Generation VVS Laxman tribute, 6 pm: Sharon Stone unplugged. 
Webchat on  in 10 mins. Look forward to your questions.  Perfect Sunday! Except didn't have pizza or pasta! Butter chicken for lunch! Does that make me 'Indian' enough?  Suprabhat. CNN IBN Must watch: Olympic heroes at 12 noon and 10 pm, life and times of BR Ambedkar 2 and 9.30, Gulzar 1.30 and 7.30 pm. 
Like to believe I am and will remain an Aam admi. No breaking the queue! Have a great day!  Long week ahead! Buzz in Delhi? After cab reshuffle, Telangana could be on agenda again!  Thank you for all the tips on where to eat in Delhi. Guess the Cholestorol will keep rising, but then again you only live once! Gnight 
Forgot an important Aam admi khaas admi distinction. Aam admi can't get school admissions, khaas admi needs one phone call!  89 year old grandmum cracked open a bottle of champagne on birthday! What's age got to do with it!!  sure. Please send me a list 
Suprabhat! my column on Vadra and the revenge of the aam admi. feedback welcome.   very fine reporting from Kudankulam. Keep it up !  With most cricketers, a bat is a axe. With Laxman, it was a magical wand. The Hyderabadi Mandrake! We will miss you. 
Pawar's assets in 2009 11 crores and an ambassador car. Guess that makes him eligible for BPL status? Gnight.  you have made my day by praising my Hindi! Truly Suprabhat!  Just asking: why is the best food in India often served in the most unhygienic environment? 
Anti corruption dilemma: law can deal with illegalities, but what of impropriety? Maybe, naming and shaming only way?  yup, bought her a special massage chair!! Now for a long, nostalgic lunch!  al Jawahar better for chicken. Karims for mutton. 
his family nor reporters have seen him since morning. He gave iview to ABP Majha before that. Hopefully, he will be home soon.  Should I order pizzas for Sunday brunch, or will it be seen as an 'Italian' connection by some? Have a great day!  Story of the day: VVS quitting intl cricket, not quite on his own terms. Wish a legend had been given a better farewell. 
4000 cr released by Centre for encephalitis. We've been running a campaign on the issue. Lets hope money goes to deserving.  Special day: my grand mum has turned 89! How cool is that! Never know what to give an 89 year old as a bday gift!  Totally secular when it comes to food: Lassi and Parathas in Chandni Chowk, kebabs and sheermal at Karims. No place like Dilli! 
10 pm: Face the Nation: The new mental health bill: is it a step in the right direction?  I agree. Wish decisions like FDI in retail had a healthier public debate.  Bohri food in Surat, Mughlai in old delhi, Avadhi in Lucknow, Hyderabadi haleem: best way to celebrate Eid. 
The Last Word at 8 pm: Ashok Khemka story: are honest IAS officers being targeted?  am sure there are good arguments against FDI in retail. But the Italian one? Next we should ban pizzas!  Just back from Karims in Jama Masjid. Korma, stew, barra and seekh kebabs and raan. All the meat you can eat! 
India at 9: is the credibility of anti corruption activists at stake? Do the Pawars have much to answer?  Justice Katju is on Devils advocate today 2 pm and 8.30 pm. rare occasion where an advocate questions a judge!  I agree. Vijay Amritraj is a made for tv host. This week, Sharon Stone, next week, another global celebrity. 
Like netas, credibility of anti corruption crusaders also at stake. Media and public is with you, dont lose the plot.  Zindagi live on IBN 7 at 11 am and 8 pm. Women in unconventional roles including a sumo wrestler!  And before I forget, Navroz Mubarak to my Parsi friends. India would be much poorer without Parsi custard and Lagan noo bhonu! 
Not nice to see anti corruption 'crusaders' fighting to take 'credit' for rehashed exposes. Bit like our tv 'exclusives'!  And if Punjab pushes ahead, can entrepreneurial Gujarat be far behind? 10 years from now, max retail stores could be in Gujarat!  Olympic heroes, Gulzar, Sharon Stone, Ambedkar: now, that's what you call an 'eclectic' Saturday! Yes, there is Kanda too! Bye! 
'Exposes' are now turning out to be old wine in an old bottle. Many of them written about and matters pending in courts.  Pumpkin of the day: SushilKumar Shine believing that like Bofors, country will forget Coalgate. Black is black Mr Shinde!  Will repeat Olympic heroes at 12 noon and 7 pm on CNN IBN. Repeats on IBN 7 too. 
Pawar to CNN IBN: Gadkari and I may be political opponents, but will be together in developing Maharashtra.  FDI in retail could be pushed by Akali-BJP ruled Punjab. What Punjabi farmer thinks today, India thinks tomorrow.  If you missed the Greatest Indian show, it repeats one last time at 2 pm today. 
Sharad Pawar to CNN IBN : Gadkari has set up agro based projects to benefit farmers. He has done no wrong.  Stupidest argument against FDI in retail? It will benefit Italian companies! How low will the mind sink?  We also have a special documentary on Ambedkar at 8.30 pm today. Rare archival stuff on the 'Greatest Indian' since Gandhi. 
It has been corrected. Thank you for pointing out.  A week is a long time in politics. last week, Sunday papers writing MMS obituary. Now, they say the 'mojo' is back!  New show starts today on CNN IBN: Dimensions with Vijay Amritraj. His first global guest is Sharon Stone. 10 pm sat, 9.30 am sun. 
In the park, lots of smiling faces. High inflation, high corruption, but mango people have not given up! Enjoy the day.  Brian Lara to CNN IBN: Sachin is God's gift to cricket; please let him decide when to retire. Amen!  Now Sushil joins us! All 6 Olympians live and exclusive!! Congrats to our sports team for pulling this off!! 
Suprabhat! Lovely autumn morning; dew in the park, slight chill in air. Spirits lifted.  take great pride in my Hindi. 18 years of living in Dilli has made me less Bambaiya! 
look forward to an expos of a media person/editor too. About time!  Don't miss: Rape: a victim's diary. A 30 minutes spl at 12 noon and 9.30 pm on CNN IBN. World beyond breaking news and shouting netas! 
Kejriwal kee Adalat episode over for the day. Till the next episode, sleep well, unless you are a neta! Gnight.  My views on the future of UPA: watch a spl debate on IBN 7 at 10 am. Hope my Hindi is seen to pass the test! 
Twitter logic: question the BJP, and you are biased. Criticise the Congress and you are neutral! C'est la vie.  Suprabhat. It's September in Delhi and there is rain in the air. Wet grass and rain clouds: the spirits are lifted. 
thank you. Stay away from alcohol on week days. News gives a high!  Just been told FDI really means Finally Didi Intervenes! Good luck and Gnight! 
Ironically, we still haven't heard from farmers who are at the heart of the debate. Will try and address the issue tomorrow.  Latest speculation is Chavan stays in Mumbai, Jaipal refuses to go to Hyderabad. 
I agree. Swapan Dasgupta making a very erudite analysis of the Kejriwal phenomenon on Face the Nation.  For PM supporters, FDI=Finally Decisive Intervention; for critics: FDI=Failing Delayed Inaction. Take your pick. 
Thanks for bouquets and brickbats to India at 9. We try our best to reflect every view without imposing our own.  thank you. The programme repeats on IBN 7 at 10 am tomw. Will UPA 2 survive the latest crisis? 
On now: Last word on CNN IBN: Karan Thapar dissects the Kejriwal 'expose' of Gadkari.  No more politics on twitter today. will try and see Barfi! Best way to stop thinking 'news'!! 
Digvijay Singh to CNN IBN: cannot compare Vadra to Gadkari. Vadra is a private citizen  Cong backed NSUI sweeps Delhi students union elections. And we thought youth were at the vanguard of anti Cong mood? 
Digvijay Singh to CNN IBN: Arvind Kejriwal has 'exposed' Gadkari at the behest of other BJP leaders!  Cabinet reshuffle: Prithviraj Chavan could move back to Delhi? Jaipal under pressure to become Andhra CM? Chiranjeevi, Tariq Anwar mantris? 
On air from 7 pm. will try and take your tweets and feedback live. India at 9: was the 'expose' a 'success'?  Here are the numbers. UPA has 273. Mamata withdraws: goes down to 254. Maya with 21 and Lalu with 4 bail govt out? 
Behind every successful neta is a real estate company, a sugar mill owner, a mining co, an education baron etc etc.  1 pm: will be reporting on Mamata's strategy for CNN IBN and IBN 7. There goes my quiet, non newsy weekend! 
What is clear after today is Arvind can no longer be called the BJP's B team. That ghost has been buried. RIP.  thank Anuj. I am a pickle freak. Will sure check out your store too. 
Should businessmen stay away from politics? Charge of conflict of interest will always be made #Gadkari  Former RSS chief KS Sudarshan passes away. RIP. 
Vidarbha suicides are an emotive issue. So how will the Gadkari 'expose' play out?  Former RSS chief KS Sudarshan passes away. RIP. 
Why do I get the impression that in India sequels never work as effectively as the original?  Off to the local kirana store to buy my favourite pickles. Not sure Walmart will have it! enjoy the weekend. 
Shall give my analysis of the Gadkari 'expose' on CNN IBN/IBN 7/IBN Lokmat shortly.  What Bengal thinks today, will India live to repent tomorrow? 
Kejriwal 'exposes' Gadkari in irrigation scam: links him to Ajit Pawar and irrigation scams in Vidarbha.  Today Vijay Amritraj has part 2 of his Donald Trump interview. 
Breaking at 9 am on CNN IBN: the truth about Robert Vadra's Corporation Bank overdraft.  Just been told Didi is holding massive rally in Kolkata! Guess 24 x 7 netas dont have weekends! Neither do us journo types! 
Suprabhat! Kejriwal ke Katghare mein aaj kaun? New episode starts today!  Hoping for a quiet, non-newsy weekend. Not sure though if Didi rests on weekends! 
One last thought: can Mr OP Chautala, the man who sold Haryana many times over stop being the flag bearer of probity? Gnight.  Indo-US nuke legacy was Vajpayee's, Cong appropriated; FDI in retail was Jaswant initiative, Cong pushing it now. 
Sms joke: Haryana was once known for its Aya Ram Gaya Ram culture. Now, it's Aya Robert, Gayi Zameen! Gnight!  Just asking: BJP initiated many reforms, including pushing for multi-brand retail? why back off now when in opposition? 
Khap leader on CNN IBN Face the nation says chow mien behind increased rape incidents. How crazy do we get!  CNN IBN: 1.30 pm #IndiaPositive, 9.30 pm: The Citizen Journalism show. Who says tv cant go beyond breaking news? 
Worst kept secret of Indian politics: Behind every successful neta is a realty firm!  30 minutes: India's Milkman: the story of Verghese Kurien 8.30 pm tonight. 
Manish Tewari deserves an award from the Congress leadership. 5 years of often defending the indefensible ain't easy.  On Southern Stars on CNN IBN: the legacy of the Rajkumar family: pride of Karnataka. 12 noon and 8 pm 
CNN IBN special invgn: How Robert Vadra acquired 75 acres in Palwal at just 2 crores. Circle rate jumped after acquisition.  #Suprabhat. Reforms put on fast track, now PM preparing for reshuffle. Sardar on a roll! 
10 pm: Face the Nation: vocabulary of rape: time for politicians to learn and change?  let the viewers decide which channel is sane and which is sensationalist. Hum to chale sone! Gnight 
India at 9: Did the Haryana govt bestow undue favours to Robert Vadra or not?  Mallya happy, Walmart happy, corporate India delighted. Aam admi? We'll just have to wait for elections! Gnight 
8.30 The Last Word: Is Kejriwal a wild card or the trump card in Indian politics?  Somehow can't imagine PM saying ' if we have to go down, we should go down fighting.' sounds more like Bhagat Singh than MMS. 
Sonia meets president for an hour, Pm meets prez for an hour. Cab reshuffle, or something more? Power corridors abuzz.  Kunal Ghosh of Trinamool on India at 9 preferred reading out Mamata's Facebook message. Better to be safe than sorry I guess! 
happy Navratra. Let the political dandia begin! Have a great day folks.  A week is a long time in politics. In India, it's a day. On wed, it was Coalgate, Thursday diesel, Friday FDI. 
it would appear so. Why would an officer be transferred to a post meant for junior officers?  Going home in pouring rain. Thank god it's Friday. Been quite a week. 
Latest on Vadra DLF deal with all the documents in possession being reported on CNN IBN. Read The Hindu for more details.  ON now: Shereen Bhan giving a hard time to Anand Sharma on CNBC and CNN IBN 
Khemka transferred out for raising questions on DLF Vadra 58 crore deal for Manesar plot. What next? Watch this space.  India at 9: Big bang Friday: is this a do or die effort by the PM? 
CNN IBN and The Hindu reporting that Vadra DLF mutation deal cancelled by IAS officer Khemka for failing to disclose all info.  So it is PM playing Dhoni with 30 runs needed in the last over. First ball has been a six! 
Suprabhat: the Vadra DLF documents in The Hindu this morning, on CNN IBN too. Could be a big break in the story.  #Indiapositive 8.30 pm on CNN IBN: stories to lift the spirits in tough times 
thank you. Still maintain best debates have less sensation, more sense.  Heard in PMO: if we have to go down, let's go down fighting! Is MMS now getting ready to bat like Dhoni in the last over? 
The only way to end media trial or street justice is to have fast track courts for corruption. Who will agree?  More big ticket announcements expected today: FDI in aviation, also possibly a window for multi brand retail. 
The only way to end media trial or street justice is to have fast track courts for corruption. Who will agree?  India at 9: fuel price hike: is UPA committing political suicide or finally showing some steel? 
In US, all crucial senate hearings are televised. Here, we have no idea what happens inside a JPC. Bring on the cameras!  6.30 pm: CNN IBN will take your questions on fuel price hike. and hopefully, we will get real 'consumers', not political activists! 
way out of K versus K battle? Fast track court, with day to day televised hearing! Doodh ka doodh, pani ka pani.  Chaliye, Phir milenge. Ache insaan Bano, baaki bas maya hai! 
10 pm: Face the Nation: is the media an ally in Team Kejriwal's fight?  Shubh Hindi Diwas! Garv se Kaho ham HMT hai! (hindi medium types!) 
India at 9: Should Khurshid step down till the Zakir Hussain trust probe is complete?  headline across papers: 'PM bites the bullet'. At this rate, he will need to go to the dentist to get teeth of steel! 
8 pm: The Last Word; Khurshid versus Kejriwal: is the minister's defence credible?  Interesting: pink papers give thumbs up, tell PM don't roll back. Mainline papers warn of inflation! 
Ashok Chavan led Cong sweeps Nanded municipal elections! C'est la electoral politics!  Suprabhat. More big ticket announcements today: Has PM finally decided that when going gets tough, tough must get going? 
Through this week CNN IBN/IBN 7 will remember the Sino Indian war of 1962. Painful memories, but a salutary lesson.  well done Pallavi. You were on top of the fuel price story! Hope you don't drive a diesel car to office! 
Suprabhat! Shubho Mahalaya. Let the festive season begin. Political fireworks also assured!  No more 'gas' on twitter tonight. Govt may charge for that too! Good luck and Gnight! 
Early night. Hope to finish Salman today. No, not Khursheed, but Salman Rushdie's book Joseph Anton! Gnight.  My economist friends say its the best thing to happen in a while. My office colleagues want an increment! 
Way out? Indep probe under fast track court. law min steps down while probe is on, Kejriwal opens himself to defamation if proven wrong.  Cynical view: diesel price hike is to take attention away from coal. Positive view: govt has decided to end policy paralysis 
Irony: when law min in dock, no UPA minister there to defend him. When Vadra in dock, cabinet ministers line up to defend.  Expect a lot of noise of a rollback in next few days, and then in true Indian style, we will 'adjust'. 
I am glad that Salman was brave enough to take tough questions. Will Vadra follow next please?  Mamata to CNN IBN on diesel hike: Enough is enough! 
In cacophony of news, press conferences become trial courts as do TV studios. Maybe, best place is an actual fast track court?  worth a read: a new book, Decoding Rahul Gandhi by Aarthi Ramachandran. She is one of my guests tonight. 
News alert: Salman Khursheed Devils Advocate will now be at 2 pm on CNN IBN. Arvind K will put up 5 qs to Khursheed at 1.  When Rahul Gandhi is being debated, can Digvijaya be far away? About to quiz him on Rahul's 'leadership' in the 8 pm news. 
Salman Khursheed is Karan Thapar's guest on Devils Advocate. Should be 'live' on CNN IBN at 12 noon.  #India Positive Acid attack victim, Sonali Mukherjee has had her first round of facial reconstruction surgery. So far, so good 
Suprabhat. Warm autumn morning. Played cricket after a year in the park. Mind willing, body clearly was not!  Big story: FDI in aviation likely to be cleared tomorrow; govt could even bite the fuel bullet. 
What kids tell netas before they go to bed? So Jao uncle nahi to Arvind sir aayenge! Fear factor part 2! Gnight.  thank you for having me. dont think I've even been to an office as 'young' as Google! felt ancient. 
Now 4 names doing the rounds who could be Kejriwal's next target. Two ministers, one CM, one party prez. Guessing games have begun.  India at 9: Is Rahul Gandhi incapable of leading the Cong? Is owning an IPl team no longer attractive? Why is the Arab world in foment? 
There is so much negative news that must be shown but need to still find space for #indiapositive .  Ok folks: thanks for ideas. Shall speak to the Google crowd on who will win the next general elections!!! 
Coming up now on CNN IBN: #indiapositive winners: Meet Col Pillai and Manohar Aich and realize idea of India is alive!  Sirs and Ladies, I have to give Google gyaan, not the other way round!! 
Pranab won Jangipur by 1.4 lakh votes, son wins by just over 2500. That too when Mamata did not put up a candidate.  Suprabhat. speaking to Google staff this morning, but not sure what to speak on. Any ideas? 
Voters angry against Congress, possibly even angrier against any form of dynasty politics, esp in a state like Bengal.  values matter, not valuation. Gnight 
Straws in the wind: BJP defeats U'khand CM's son in Tehri, Pranab's son scrapes through by 2500 votes in Jangipur.  middle class is not determined by income alone, but by state of mind. 
On Dimensions with Vijay Amritraj: the original bad boy of tennis: Jimmy Connors at 10 pm on CNN IBN. Not to be missed.  And yes, the middle class is caught in traffic jams at 11 pm! As I am now. Guess we all have our angst! Gnight. 
We have laws, outlaws and in laws! Take your pick and have a good weekend folks!  Dalits/obcs have a political voice, the middle class has influence, the elite has resources, the tribals have lost out. 
Market buzz: Nitin Gadkari is 'target' of Team Kejriwal on 16th. If true, Wonder how that will change the state of play.  if tribals didn't resort to jal satyagraha with dramatic visuals, not sure if it would even register on national conscience. 
Weekend spls: Prithviraj on southern stars (12 and 8 pm), #indiapositive (1.30 and 7.30) CJ show (9.30 pm), living it up (12.30 and 6.30)  India got independence in 1947; tribals in several parts still haven't got theirs. Sad. 
Big story we are following this morning: CAG inspection report on Khursheed's trust. A minister a day keeps channels at play!!  There are land displacement battles being fought in every corner of India. It's the big story of our times. 
On the road with Narendra Modi will play on weekend on CNN IBN. 10 am and 8.30 pm and 11.30 pm Sat, 2 pm and 9.30 Sunday.  Every time the opposition attacks Rahul, the Priyanka for politics war cry begins in a section of Cong. 
Suprabhat! October air very bracing. Lifts the spirits on the weekend. Morning walk is antidote to all fatigue.  Priyanka Gandhi to CNN IBN : I am not joining politics; my trips to Rae Bareli are purely for helping my mother. 
Politics in the age of the OB van. Is it good or bad for democracy? Not sure. On that rather ambivalent note, Gnight!  Extending India at 9 till 10.30 to keep tabs on Hyderabad hostage drama. A constable holding an SP hostage! 
Politics of accusation must not end up as theatre of the absurd. Overreaction on all sides, including the media.  Coming up on India at 9: can Yuvraj inspire a nation in the fight against cancer? 
from anna to , when will the govt learn? people have right to protest. Or are they worried about the 24x7 news play out?  10 pm: Face the nation: has Yuvraj become the face of the fight against cancer? Cancer survivors speak out 
Nice to sit at home and watch my colleague Bhupen Chaubey anchor India at 9. Old order changeth yielding place to new!  India at 9: From MP to Kudankulam, is the state intolerant of public protests? Big story: US ambassador killing. 
No Cong spokesperson is willing to come to defend their MP Mr Radadiya's indefensible action.  7 pm: Aseem Trivedi speaks out. 7.30 pm: Sanjay Manjrekar and Maninder Singh analyse Yuvi's comeback 
sadly arrogance is not the preserve of any one party. It is now endemic to the political system.  breaking on coalgate on Good evening India on CNN IBN now: another Jindal mine project comes under scanner. 
That an MP from Gandhi's birthplace brandishes a gun when asked to pay Rs 50 toll is a sign of how far we've come!  8 pm Last Word: is the UPA government afraid of taking tough economic decisions, and is costing the country dearly? 
sign of the times: phone lines jammed in our call in show on how to rein in netas drunk on power.  today's #Indiapositive Baghpat's grandmums who are learning shooting to fight gender prejudice! 
Damaged it has been. Question is: just how much and will it be lasting this time?  Gaali to Bahut dete hai. Kabhi Kabhi Sachi tareef achee lagti hai! 
we live in an age where today's news can become tomorrow's history. which is a worry. Hence, the question.  yes, Kayani Shrewsbury biscuits! Simply the best! 
8 pm: The Last Word: Has Robert Vadra damaged the Gandhi family image?  Hats off to news anchors/desk of all channels who do early morning shift. Not easy to look good and sharp at 6 am every day! 
10 pm: Worldview; the incredibly poignant story of Malala.  Redrawing Hindu-Muslim relations. worth a read.  
India at 9: MPs drunk on power; how do we rein them in? Haryana's 'consensual' rape shocker. Kejriwal's 'arrest'.  And my final morning tonic: Shrewsbury biscuits from Pune with South Indian coffee. Heaven! Have a great day. 
America elects presidents on old style school debates? It's fun, but give me a Lalu, Modi, Mamata any day! Have a great day!  Watching breakfast with India on CNN IBN. All news, no noise: good way to start the morning! 
#suprabhat! I thought we had a lot of hot air on Indian news TV, but American TV way way ahead in hot air race!  Suprabhat. Walking in a dew spotted garden with the dog. Come back feeling rejuvenated. Try it. 
Four Indian teams in t 20 Champions League but West Indies and Pakistan's top team has to 'qualify'? Wake up organizers.  Cricket games are won by 11 individuals. Hearts are won at times by just one! Yuvi won, India lost! Gnight. 
it was asked sir. Very much asked. Gnight.  And now that game one is over, let's judge Yuvi by the runs he scores, not by sentiment. 
your feedback well taken, there is always a next time!  Sentiment shouldn't rule sport, but hey, what would sport be without emotion! Welcome back Yuvi! 
my father used to say: great power breeds great arrogance. As I grow older, I know exactly what he meant. Gnight!  India lost by one run, Yuvraj won by many more! 
#Modi interview will replay at midnight and then on weekend. Should be on ibnlive site too soon.  10 pm: Face the nation: are benami transactions the bedrock of political donations? 
To get an interview, will happily sit anywhere. No ego in journalism. Will Sonia oblige next?!  India at 9: The Goa mining scam; are anti nuke protestors foreign funded? Newsmaker: Manohar Parikar 
some say you were too soft with Modi, others say you we're rude! Damned if you do, damned if you don't!  8 pm: The Last word: time to scrap sedition law? 
To those who ask why I was happy to sit 'below' #Modi in the interview, my simple answer: journalists must always be down to earth!  Suprabhat. Andy Murray wins US Open, first Briton to win a Grand Slam in 76 years! They also serve those who stand and wait! 
with Narendra #Modi, the questions he chooses not to answer are often more revealing than what he does!  Don't ever again call politicians and parliament a 'cartoon network'. May get jailed for sedition!! Gnight. 
PTI denies #Modi claim to CNN IBN that he based his Rs 1880 cr figure on Sonia's expenses on PTI report. No such report was filed says PTI  Long day and it's only Monday. A six day weekend one day maybe?! 
Next year, on October 11, will attempt a special feature on JP! a forgotten hero!  Next on India at 9 #Indiapositive story of the day. Portable incubators are changing lives in four southern states. 
The Amitabh Bachchan interview 70 years young on CNN IBN, repeats at 10.30 pm. not to be missed!  Bhupen Chaube putting some tough questions to Naveen Jindal on coal allocations. On now. 
10 pm: Face the nation: Robert Vadra and the mango men. Vocabulary of elitism?  why don't you ask Kiran Bedi on which channel she was 'live' and who used a recorded discussion as live at 9? 
India at 9: Dont miss: The Narendra #Modi interview. Is the transition from regional to national leader complete?  thank you. I dont approve of the cartoons, but to call them seditious is ridiculous. 
8 pm: the last word: SGPC honours Gen Vaidya's assassins. What is the message being sent out?  If Parikkar can clean up Goa's dirty politics, he could be another PM contender from the BJP!! 
sorry. Kannadiga identity. Typo!  Breaking: BJP's Goa CM Parrikar stops all mining in Goa till complete review. 
I am proud of my Maharashtrian identity, but I respect the Kannadiha identity too. Can we now ensure mutual respect?  Look, even if Aseem is a bad cartoonist, why should he be jailed for sedition? A bad cartoonist should be ignored, not jailed 
Neither does Mumbai 'belong' to Maharashtrians, nor Belgaum Kannadigas. we all belong to India.  Back to anchoring India at 9 after weekend. Back to the news treadmill. c'est la vie 
Can Marathi speaking journalists not report on Belgaum issue when the president visits the area? Are we one country folks?  10 pm: India's Milkman. For those who missed our spl tribute to Dr Kurien, we salute a great Indian. 
IBN Lokmat journalist Dinesh Keluskar detained by K'taka police for reporting on president visit to Belgaum.  India at 9: Must Aseem Trivedi be released right away? Newsmaker: Naveen Jindal. Ground report: Kudankulam 
Time to go to work. Aaram haram hai! Enjoy the day.  8 pm: The Last word: Karan Thapar quizzes Arun Jaitley on what next in Coalgate. 
mine is to do a job of asking questions. Mamata ho ya Gadkari, Bachchan ho ya Modi. Hopefully, Sonia/ Vadra next?!  Good evening India at 6 pm on CNN IBN: Press Council Chairman Justice Katju on why police, and not Aseem must be arrested 
thanks Dibang. Guess growing up in 70s, we had 2 icons, Bachchan and Gavaskar.  breaking now: Mumbai police ready to surrender Aseem Trivedi's custody. Some sense at last it appears. 
My timeline already deluged by the Modi fan club with their routine abuse. And they haven't even seen the iview! Wah!  agreed. Gujarat has shown the way to India on power situation. Worthy of emulating and all credit to Modi govt. 
Half hour Modi interview will run on IBN 7 at 8.30 pm, CNN IBN at 9 pm.  MP govt bows to people protests. Reduces water flow at Onkareshwar. Impact of tv images? 
#Modi in IBN interview stays silent when asked on Nitish, campaigning in Bihar and any apology for Gujarat 2002.  Ashis Nandy is one of the finest scholars of modern India. If you see the sedition case against him, it is laughable. 
#Modi to IBN: The centre treats Gujarat as an enemy state. If they hit us, we will hit back.  Nope. calling for uniform protest against any form of arbitary arrest. Arrest for hate speech, not for art, parody and satire. 
#Modi to IBN: I never raised Sonia's health expenses, only her foreign travel. It was for PM, not Sonia to clarify.  Sedition must be struck off the statute books. Colonial law, liable to misuse by the state. 
#Modi to IBN: my focus is only on Gujarat. Talk of my PM ambition and wanting to come to Delhi is media speculation  Scholar Ashis Nandy was charged with sedition by Guj govt a few years ago when he wrote an article. No support for him? 
Running short news clips of the Narendra Modi interview through the day. Full interview in the evening on IBN 7 and CNN IBN.  Good to see support for #AseemTrivedi. Wish we had seen similar support for MF Husain when he was targeted. 
Suprabhat. On the road with Narendra Modi. Don't miss my campaign trail interview with the man who could be PM! IBN 7 and CNN IBN  Will have to apply for anticipatory bail for Cyrus, Kunal and week that wasn't team soon! Vinaash kaal, viprit budhi! Gnight 
Big B has a rare quality missing in much of India today. Simply put, it's called 'class'! Gnight.  Cartoonist #AseemTrivedi being arrested for sedition? We are a crazy police state at times. All support for him. 
Thoughts today with Malala Yusufzai. Incredible courage, may god give her strength!  10 pm: Yesudas spl, 10.30 pm: India's Milkman, 11.30 pm: India Positive on CNN IBN. Who says news tv is only about negativism? 
for those who missed it, Big B interview repeats at 11.:30 am and 10.30 pm tomw.  Today is 5 years of Zindagi Live on IBN 7. 8 pm on IIT suicides. Long before Satyamev Jayate, there was Zindagi Live!! 
Thank you all for very kind messages on Big B. all credit to the awesome CNN IBN features team and the wonderfully gracious Big B.  many have tweeted asking for repeat of Kurien docu on CNN IBN. Will rpt 10.30 pm today, 10 pm tomorrow. 
very kind. Thankless job, but we try our best. Some days it works, some it doesn't.  media hasn't spared Tytler. Fact:5 years ago, we even did a sting op that led to reopening of 84 case. 
On now: Bachchan 70 years young on CNN IBN. Team has worked very hard to get rare footage/stories.  Yesudas: 'my god is omnipresent. He has no religion'. never has a truer word been spoken. 
too unwell to party, just about well to anchor the news on reserve energy!  Now watching Yesudas special on CNN IBN. A voice made in heaven, truly divine. 
Glad many of you liked India at 9. Remember today it's Vadra facing the heat, tomorrow who knows? news kee gadi chalti rahegi!  "More difficult to captain an IPL team than India": Ganguly at Dilip Sardesai memorial lecture.  
with all respect, in a 24 hour news cycle, there is so little to celebrate. why grudge celebrating the life and times of an icon?  The Dilip Sardesai memorial cricket lecture delivered by Sourav Ganguly.  
its a 90 minute iview with Big B. but then, he is the biggest star of the century. we've all gone old watching him!  Bal Thackeray's Sunday googly: Sushma Swaraj most suitable BJP/NDA candidate for PM! 
Very little is known about Big B's Kolkata days. Or how he owes a debt to Mehmood. Find out more on CNN IBN at 10 pm  more power to you! 
Must read; Vadra versus Kejriwal:a class war:   Ok folks! No more Sunday tweeting. And when you put Amul butter on your toast, think of #DrVergheseKurien. Bye! 
Lot of Big B interviews, can assure CNN IBN spl is worth it: from Allahabad to Sherwood to Kolkata to cinema, its a life's journey  If Modi said what Gogoi did, the Cong would go for him. What of their own chief minister now? 
10 pm: 70 years young: Big B spl. From his first school play, to first date, to first film to being declared clinically dead  Tarun Gogoi tells Karan Thapar on Devils Advocate: Muslims 'multiply' faster because they are illiterate! Wonder what Cong will say now?! 
India at 9: time for Vadra to come clean on all his property transactions? also:BJP's Ajay Sancheti faces more qs in M'tra's irrigation scam  #DrVergheseKurien : Kerala his janmabhoomi, Gujarat his karmabhoomi, a great Indian story. RIP 
The Last word at 8 pm: is the Robert Vadra-DLF deal the 'smoking gun' in this case?  Very impressed by audience at Prakash Kardaley lecture. Punekars, thankfully, retain the city's tradition for public debate 
Breaking at 6 on CNN IBN" we get more evidence of Vadra's property deals beyond DLF: this time in Mewat.  Sunday early morning at Pune airport. Not my idea of fun! Missing my beagle, walk and yes, the maalish!! 
On the day Mayawati to decide on supporting UPA, assets case revived in SC! Now you know what her decision will be! Enjoy the day!  Don't miss: India's Milkman, a CNN IBN spl tribute to Dr Kurien at 12 and 6.30 pm. And show it to your kids! Will inspire them 
Suprabhat. Just did a 24 hour cycle without tv or twitter. Enough to revive the spirit and be back in good health!  Dr Kurien was CNN IBN lifetime achievement award winner last year. Go and check his remarkable speech online. 
I am a mango person. Actually, an Alphonso mango person! And I have a banana for breakfast! Gnight.  Released Vineeta Deshmukh's book, 'The Mighty Fall' on Prez Patil's land grab. Power of RTI and citizen journalism. 
10.30 pm on CNN IBN: the first of our Amitabh spls as we build towards his 70th birthday on Thursday.  Leaving Pune back to Delhi. Thank you Vineeta Deshmukh and Punekars for organizing such a wonderful memorial lecture. 
10 pm: face the nation: does the media shy away from the Gandhi family?  In my view, Dr Kurien deserved a Bharat Ratna. True institution builder, father of the milk revolution. 
India at 9: indep probe needed in Vadra case? Why are young women so vulnerable in Haryana?  Suprabhat: sad news Sunday morning. One of the great sons of this country, Dr Verghese Kurien, the Amul man, is no more 
The Last Word at 8 pm: Kejriwal vs DLF/Vadra. where does the truth lie?  300 episodes of Cyrus and week that wasn't. One hour spl: 10.30 pm sat, Sunday at 10 am, 2 pm and 8 pm. 
Lost an old friend in tragic circumstances. Varsha Bhosale. RIP.  10 pm: Dimensions with Vijay Amritraj: Vijay's guest this week is Donald Trump 
I am a West Indian! Born in Ahmedabad, grew up in Mumbai, dad from Goa. Enjoy the Gangnam! Gnight.  ON CNN IBN: 7.30 pm Asha Bhosale birthday special. 8 pm: Yesudas in our southern star series. A real musical treat. 
Only Jayawardene stands between me and the Gangnam!  at Bharatiya Vidya Bhavan, Senapati Bapat Marg. 
our anthem is the best in the world  thanks, enjoyed addressing the law college graduates in Pune. Young and idealistic! Keep it up. 
thank you. Am glad you liked the gadkari interview  Kardaley was a RTI activist and former Indian express resident editor. A journalist from the age of activism, not of sensationalism! 
'National' anthems reflect the way a team plays? West Indies song full of fun and excitement, Lanka stylish and lilting.  addressing Prakash Kardaley memorial lecture on media and anti corruption mvts in Pune at 5.30. All are welcome ! 
my colleague Pallavi is a huge #BiggBoss fan! For me, the boss tonight is Gayle! 9 pm on #Colors.  did an interview with Raj 7 years ago in Hindi for NDTV before he discovered Hindi was an alien language! 
Down with fever. Now hoping the cricket will lift the spirit. And with no India and PAK, can watch in peace. Enjoy!  doesn't want to do an interview with us because feels as Maharashtrians we should have taken his side! His loss! 
IBN Lokmat will show Gadkari iview at 8 pm.  Suprabhat. early Sunday from Mumbai to Pune to address Prakash Kardaley memorial lecture on Media and anti corruption mvts. 
A Sunday where am learning the Gangnam steps! Hoping for a Gayle storm this evening. Have a great day!  thank you Harsha for the wonderful moderating of Dilip Sardesai lecture. You made it a special evening. 
Arvind may have nothing to hide so he readily agreed. Good for him. but Karan has a right to question him too.  Wonderful warm evening. 4th Dilip Sardesai cricket lecture. Thank you to all who came. And a special thanks to Dada. 
Karan Thapar asks tough qs of all. If Vadra agrees, he will tear into him. Problem: Vadra may not come before the Devils Advocate!  no broadcast, but will try and put up the video on cricket websites. 
Reminder: Gadkari on irrigation scam, a bizman neta, Vadra, BJP's PM candidates, FDI and more. 6 pm CNN IBN, 7.30 IBN 7  Oldest living test cricketer Madhav Mantri comes to the lecture each time. One of my father's cricket mentors. 
Southern Stars on CNN IBN. Meet Sudeep, Kannada cinema's all rounder. 1.30 and 10 pm.  4th Dilip Sardesai memorial cricket lecture at 5.30 pm. Delivered by Sourav Ganguly. Wonderful to be in company of old cricketers. 
Suprabhat! On now, profiling #indiapositive awards on CNN IBN. Some inspirational people.  thanks Abhijeet. Good meeting you too 
main news points will run on CNN IBN from Sunday morning.  Suprabhat. Delighted Sourav Ganguly is delivering the 4th Dilip Sardesai memorial lecture today. A special day for us. 
Gadkari: We will support Mamata's no confidence motion, will oppose FDI in insurance and pension.  Open Letter to Raj Thackeray: my column in the Hindustan Times.  
Gadkari: we stayed silent on Vadra because we did not want to go on allegations.  that's the nicest thing someone can say. Thank you for the kindness and good wishes. 
Gadkari: no BJP candidate for PM before general elections irrespective of Gujarat results.  all good things must come to an end! 
thanks. IBN 7 iview with Gadkari at 7.30 pm on Sunday.  old order changeth yielding place to new! It's the circle of life . 
Very newsy interview with Gadkari. Should be on IBN 7 in full some time tomorrow.  thanks. Look forward to meeting you and many friends in Mumbai tomorrow 
Gadkari has lost weight, but not his appetite. Served wonderful pani puri and pav bhaji!  Bhupen Chaube takes over India at 9 tomorrow. Time to retire! Good luck and Gnight! 
Just interviewed Nitin Gadkari. Combative as ever. Says he will quit politics if anyone proves his business links to Ajay Sancheti.  Power minister calls meeting on Khandwa dam a day after CNN IBN showcased the unique water protests! Who says netas don't watch news!! 
sorry, Devils Advocate with Arvind Kejriwal repeats at 11 pm tonight.  breaking at 9: another Cong MP in eye of coal storm and why? 
would love to have a Devils interview with Mr Vadra. But somehow fear he will not agree. Sadly.  yes, Ahir is a three time BJP, a self-confessed Savarkarite, says his family fought with Shivaji's army! 
Devils with Arvind Kejriwal repeats at 11.30 pm, and then 2 pm and 8.30 pm sun.  Sad to see constables again in the line of fire, this time in Odisha. Plan to take it up on India at 9. 
Arvind Kejriwal live on Devils Advocate with Karan Thapar at 4.30 pm on CNN IBN  Man of the match in coal: Chandrapur MP Hansraj Ahir. 
on twitter, if you attack Cong, you get kudos, if you question BJP, you are 'biased'! C'est la vie.  Had a wonderful Maharashtrian lunch with the true man of the match in the coal allocations scandal. Guess who? 
Shall spend weekend looking for an unsecured loan at zero interest! Or find a friend in irrigation construction! Bye!  Inanity of the day: Did Thackerays come from Bihar or not? For god sake, cant we debate something more substantial? 
planning to come up with another name on October 10th. Is he now the new opposition?  breaking now: Rs 5 per litre petrol price hike in next 24 to 48 hours. 
and why just netas? From babus to babas from bizmen to even media, benami properties are fruits of corruption.  Breaking on CNN IBN: threat to oil refineries. Mumbai oil refineries placed on high alert. 
I am sure there are many netas out there with benami properties. It's a case of 'Jo pakda Gaya woh chor!'  10 pm: Face the Nation: Trainers recommending steroids: can a gym culture be harmful at times? 
am used to the guys who use words like #paidmedia loosely. Bias lies in eye of beholder.  India at 9: Sivakasi fire: does anyone care about those who work in hazardous factories? CAG on power: the next bombshell? 
is cell phone tower phone radiation dangerous to health? Watch Living it Up Sat 12.30 and 5.30, Sun 9.30 am and 3.30 pm on CNN IBN.  8 pm: The Last word: Brand Manmohan: is it in permanent decline? 
Suprabhat. We are repeating last night's India at 9 debate on Robert Vadra at 9 am this morning. Worth a watch.  Breaking now: how delayed hydropower projects have cost the exchequer 17,600 crores says the CAG. 
our fathers will toast a win in heaven to the Windies, esp if they go all the way!  Breaking now: CNN IBN accesses another CAG report: this time on the hydropower sector. More evidence of sloth. 
From today, the definition of a DLF maximum has changed forever! Gnight.  Suprabhat: Msg from US democratic convention. America wants Bill Clinton back as president!! 
repeats at midnight and if no breaking news then at 9 am in morning too.  Does a laborer's life in Sivakasi have no value? Or is death an annual ritual in a factory of faceless Indians? Gnight 
My day is made! The windies beat the Aussies! Now to hope they win the big one! Will do a Calypso jig!  Tragic story of the day: Sivakasi fire. Will parliament observe a minute's silence for the dead? Or make more noise tomorrow? 
Thank you the kind words to debate on India at 9. Our aim is every day to present all viewpoints without fear or favor.  Will we get over a colonial mindset: when foreigners praise us, we get elated; when they criticize us, we take umbrage. 
8 pm: The Last Word: Karan Thapar dissects the allegations against Vadra.  to be frank, no govt has received as much media criticism, domestic and foreign, as much as UPA 2. 
About to iview Prashant Bhushan on Robert Vadra. On CNN IBN  Story of the day: neck deep water protest in MP's Khandwa against a dam. Guess it requires a bizarre protest to attract natl attention. 
